The patient could be discharged from hospital on the 18th postoperative day in absolute good health.
Since mitochondrial diseases lead frequently to severe phenotypes and are often hereditary, there is a need for genetic counselling of the affected families.
The specific features of mitochondrial genetics, however, hamper straightforward definition of recurrence risks as in Mendelian diseases.
Empirical risks were recently provided for MELAS and MERRF syndromes and for Leber hereditary optic neuropathy.
In MELAS and MERFF, higher levels of mutant mtDNA in the mothers' blood were associated with an increased frequency of affected offspring.
Chronic progressive external ophthalmoplegia and Kearns-Sayre syndrome are in general sporadic disorders without increased recurrence risks in the offspring.
As Leigh syndrome is found with maternal, autosomal recessive or X chromosomal transmission, the definition of the molecular defect is crucial for genetic counselling.
Prenatal diagnosis was reported only in one case of mitochondrial disease so far, and in our opinion it remains questionable because of the uncertain correlation of the proportion of mutant DNA in chorionic villi and in  clinically relevant tissues such as brain.
An accurate and complete depiction of the halo naevus has been left by Matthias Grünewald in his painting "The Temptation of St. Anthony", which is part of the Isenheim altar piece (1512 - 1516), which is now exhibited in Colmar, Alsace.
In contrast, Sutton in 1916 only described a "leucoderma acquisitum centrifugum", leaving the nature of the central lesion in the dark.
The term Sutton naevus therefore appears less appropriate than the alternative eponymic designation "Grünewald naevus".
In women with breast cancer, staging of the tumor plays an important role and often is considered to be the most prognostic and therapeutic factor.
The most widely used staging system is based on the pathologic TNM classification.
In recent years conservative therapies such as preoperative chemo- or radiotherapy are used more often with limited tissue evaluation resulting in insufficient or even inaccurate staging data.
Tumor size as well as nodal involvement is decisive in selecting a treatment method and assessing the response.
Thus, more accurate preoperative in vivo staging is necessary.
This article therefore gives an overview of the different imaging modalities (mammography, ultrasonography, magnetic resonance imaging, and nuclear medicine) used for breast cancer staging.
Furthermore, results of these methods are compared critically with the pathohistologic staging.
The lack of muscle control in neurological disorders often leads to deformities of the foot.
The equinus (a contracture of the triceps surae muscle), the abduction and clubfoot deformity are the most common ones.
The present paper describes the deformities and stresses the functional relevance for the patient.
Therapeutic principles of the conservative orthopaedic means are described with special emphasis on the need of an adequate height of the aide and the foot position.
Casting and the application of Botulinun toxine are described having a major side effect of muscle weakening.
A combination of the different procedures, surgical interventions included, need to be selected for each patient offering the best management for each individual problem.
Still's disease was originally described as one form of rheumatoid arthritis in children beginning with fever and other systemic symptoms.
In rare cases it may also begin in the adult and is then referred to as adult-onset Still's disease.
The diagnostic criteria include typical rash, arthralgias, bouts of fever, and leukocytosis, as well as lymphadenopathy or splenomegaly, liver dysfunctions, non-infectious angina, and absence of rheumatoid factor and antinuclear antibodies.
We report two adult patients with longstanding disease whose exanthema guided us to the correct diagnosis.
The rash is a finding with high sensitivity.
It is characterized by red macules with distinct borders and is evanescent.
During an acute flare of the rash, gentle friction induces erythematous, isomorphic (Koebner) phenomena, which, as we describe here for the first time, may persist longer than the remainder of the fleeting rash.
Objective: Patients in a surgical intensive care unit (ICU) have a high incidence of nosocomial infections which often lead to septic shock and death.
Since calculated antibiotic treatment is often difficult, it was recommended to obtain routine nose/throat swabs in order to have a better idea of the causative agent when a systemic inflammatory response occurs in a given patient.
Methods: In 1435 patients of our cardio-surgical ICU, routine nose/throat swabs were taken three times a week and tested for micro-organisms and resistance to antibiotics.
Of these 86 patients developed clinical signs of systemic inflammation, and additional blood cultures were obtained.
Antibiotic treatment was achieved to cover the microbes from the nose/throat swabs, or a calculated dosage was given to patients whose swabs had tested negative.
Results: Of the 86 patients with systemic inflammation, 29 had blood cultures positive for microbes.
Of these 29 patients, 18 received a calculated antibiotic coverage based on their positive nose/throat cultures prior to the return of the blood cultures from the lab.
However, in only 11 of the 18 patients were routine swabs and blood cultures positive with the same microbes.
While positive routine swabs are quite specific for sepsis when there is a systemic inflammatory response, routine swabs are not a suitable screening tool due to their low sensitivity.
Conclusions: Routine nose/throat swabs led to earlier specific antibiotic treatment in only 22% of our patients with clinical signs of systemic inflammation.
In addition, in almost 40% of the cases organisms detected in the routine swabs and blood cultures were not identical.
As a result, we feel that routine swabs are only of limited value in instituting earlier, specific antibiotic treatment in septic patients.
The influence of defensivity, measured by validity scales of personality inventories (MMPI-K, FPI-R, GIESSEN-Test) on test results and psychotherapy outcome was studied in 309 patients treated with inpatient client-centered therapy.
In general, psychotherapy patients exhibited low defensivity.
25% of patients, who denied psychopathology at admission, did so at discharge and to some extent at follow-up, demonstrating an "especially good outcome" (means).
Relative improvement (effect sizes), however, was significantly diminished in psychopathology scales and significantly enlarged in validity scales.
- Results are discussed with regard to prior hypotheses about the influence of defensivity.
In our study we tested 2 different rapid assays for cardiac troponin t (TropT-rapid assay, diagnostic cut-off 0,2 ng/ml and TropTsensitive-rapid assay, diagnostic cut-off 0,1 ng/ml) in 75 chest pain patients.
Additional to the emergency ECG (3-lead) we acquired a 12-lead ECG.
The TropT-rapid assay showed a sensitivity of 11% (specifity 94,3%).
The TropT sensitive-rapid assay showed a sensitivity of 62% (specifity 100%).
Despite the great number of publications during the last 10 years concerning the indication, technique and results of operative treatment of acetabular fractures, conservative treatment still has an important role when considering the therapeutic possibilities.
Because of the modern techniques of radiological imaging and improvement of diagnostic facilities, a more defined indication for treatment becomes possible.
Conventional X-rays, completed by special projections like the Ala and Obturator view, and a CT scan allow determination of the fracture type (the Letournel/Judet classification or the AO classification).
The most suitable treatment can then be adapted to the individual circumstances of the patient, i. e., age, general condition and overall severity of traumatic impairment.
Determination of the intact part of the weight-bearing dome is important in selecting the most adequate therapeutic procedure.
The larger the intact roof arc, the better the prognosis.
Together with the X-ray controls following axial and facultative lateral extentions, the indication for conservative treatment can be confirmed.
Early active motion of the injured limb, followed by walking exercises with partial weight-bearing, are important aspects of nonoperative treatment.
Conservative treatment is recommended in non-displaced fractures or in fractures with little displacement, transverse fractures of the lower region or severely comminuted acetabular fractures with no possibility of reconstruction.
Our clinical and radiological follow-up of 97 patients with acetabular fractures from the years 1981-1990 showed that the majority were treated conservatively (approx.
The functional result after an average observation period of more than 70 months was good or excellent (based on the Merle d'Aubigné score).
We feel it is important to look at operative and conservative treatment of acetabular fractures as two complementary non-competitive therapeutic methods.
The choice of treatment should be based on an exact diagnosis considering fracture type, the individual circumstances of the patient, and application of the necessary diagnostic facilities.
Conservative treatment can lead to excellent long-term results.
Problem There is a great need to expand current knowledge of the various functional capacity measurements used in the rehabilitation of chronic low back pain (CLBP) patients.
The literature on these patients reports that mobility, endurance, trunk strength and lifting capacity decrease during the process of chronicity.
Chronically disabled patients appear to have lower functional capacity than asymptomatic persons.
Methods Our study group consisted of 90 disabled CLBP patients (44 female, 46 male; average age 42 years) who underwent a multidisciplinary 8-week daily treatment program of functional restoration with behavioral support (instruction, endurance training, strength exercises, behavioral and treatment to facilitate return to work therapy).
Initially these patients where compared with 107 asymptomatic persons (44 female, 63 male, average age 41 years).
The patients were investigated before and after treatment, and at intervals of 6 and 12 months.
The reliability of the functional measurements was evaluated by interrater comparison.
Physical assessment included a medical examination (mainly diagnosis of radicular or nonradicular pain), changes in the lumbar spine revealed by X-ray studies according to Herron and Turner [50], rating of physical impairment according to Waddell [117], flexibility, length of hamstrings muscles (SLR), test of power and endurance of trunk movement by standardized exercises according to the Swiss group of Spring [102] and isokinetic measurements (LIDO Back), tests of lifting capacity (LIDO Lift), and (in part) of general endurance on a cycle ergometer (CASE 15 Marquette).
Results Physical findings showed that mobility was reduced substantially in patients suffering from back pain due to reduced SLR (shortened hamstrings) and decreased spinal mobility.
Patients also demonstrated significant reductions in their ability to perform lifting tasks in comparison to healthy individuals.
The results of trunk flexion showed no significant differences between patients and the control group, whereas the ability to perform trunk extension was much better in the control group.
In principle we found the same results with isokinetic measurements as in the exercises without machines.
Cardiovascular endurance was also much better in the control group than it was in the back pain patients.
At the end of the treatment program all physical deficits were improved significantly.
In many cases performance was comparable with that of the control group.
With time, however, training effects gradually decreased.
The success of treatment (return to work, absence from work, pain reduction, use of medical care) was independent of the functional status of the patients before and after treatment.
Conclusion Study results showed that physical capacity in disabled patients with low back pain is substantially reduced in comparison to persons who do not suffer from back pain.
The only exception was in trunk flexor strength and endurance, in which measurements did not differ between the patients and the control group.
However, even CLBP- patients with long-term pain and severe physical illness can successfully improve their physical condition by participating in an active treatment program.
Back extensor muscle training has to be included in physical therapy.
Because of loss of condition during the time after treatment, regular monitoring of patients and their home training programs is necessary.
Overall, treatment of CLBP has to include physical training and psychosocial treatment to achieve satisfactory results.
The dynamic behavior of the ossicular chain is very complex and is frequency-dependent.
To date, this has still not been fully investigated or understood.
There remains a lack of measurement procedures to pick up the motion of the ossicles and ear drum simultaneously with sufficient resolution.
The presented paper reports simultanous measurements with laser-Doppler vibrometry at two points of the ossicular chain of cadaver specimens.
Motions not observed were derived using mechanical simulation models on a computer and then evaluating appropriate mathematical equations.
Using a sound stimulus, the displacement velocities of the umbo and stapes footplate were measured, and the corresponding transfer functions were derived by Fourier transform.
Results were used for verification of the computer models.
In the current investigations these models were refined and allow for the detailed investigation of the dynamic behavior of the ossicular chain, facilitating the optimal design of passive and active middle-ear implants.
Problem: Postoperative nausea and vomiting remains an important problem.
Many risk factors have been identified; however, the importance of postoperative analgesic technique and patient expectation remain poorly defined.
Reactive oxygen species (ROS) are probably not only unintended, toxic side-products of oxygen metabolism in mammalian cells, they also have several important physiologic functions including antimicrobial killing, regulation of cellular proliferation and growth, and regulation of vascular tone.
ROS are generated within the vessel wall by several mechanisms, including a vascular type of a NAD(P)H oxidase.
ROS formation can be stimulated by mechanical stress, environmental factors, the peptide angiotensin II, cytokines, native low-density lipoproteins (LDL), and in the presence of catalytic metal ions.
Their ability to modify LDL, react with endothelial-derived nitric oxide subsequently forming peroxynitrite, and amplify the expression of various genes important for leukocyte recruitment within the arterial wall are the basis of the oxidant injury theory of atherosclerosis.
In animal studies, antioxidant therapy (probucol, butylated hydroxytoluene, N',N'-diphenylendiamide, vitamin E, superoxide dismutase) have been successfully used to prevent fatty streak formation, and to restore impaired nitric oxide-dependent vasorelaxation.
In man, antioxidant therapy (e.g., supplementation with vitamin E) clearly increased the resistance of LDL to oxidative modification.
Case-controlled and prospective clinical studies suggest a relation between baseline antioxidant plasma levels and/or antioxidant supplementation and risk of cardiovascular events.
In one secondary prevention trial (randomized, blinded, placebo-controlled), vitamin E supplementation reduced significantly the risk for non-fatal myocardial infarctions.
Before general recommendations can be made, results of further large-scale trials should be awaited.
A 36-year old man suffered an isolated head injury with a fracture of the skull, epidural and subdural hematomas as well as brain contusion (Abbreviated Injury Scale (AIS): 5 points).
The hematomas were evacuated by craniotomy.
Because of high intracranial pressure (ICP) a barbiturate coma was necessary.
Additionally, the patient demonstrated acute lung injury (ARDS) due to pneumonia 8 days after trauma.
The patient recovered slowly and was transferred to neurorehabilitation on day 57 after injury.
During the following 12 months the patient developed a significant deficit of hip motion (extension/flexion: right: 0 °/10 °/20 °, left: 0 °/10 °/30 °; external/internal rotation: right and left: <5 °/0 °/<5 °; abduction/adduction: right: 10 °/0 °/25 °, left: 10 °/0 °/10 °).
X-rays and CT-scanning revealed severe heterotopic ossification (HO) of both hips with ancylosis (Brooker type IV).
Resection of HO was carried out in a two stage procedure using Smith-Petersen approach.
The prophylaxis for recurrence of HO included preoperative single-dose radiation (8 Gy) and postoperative treatment with indomethacin (150 mg per day).
The patient revealed 15 (left hip) and 12 (right hip) months after surgery the following range of hip movement: extension/flexion: right: 5 °/0 °/90 °, left: 5 °/0 °/100 °; external/internal rotation: right: 20 °/0 °/30 °, left: 20 °/0 °/20 °; abduction/adduction: right: 30 °/0 °/40 °, left: 30 °/0 °/40 °.
No recurrence of HO was observed in x-ray.
The patient is able to work in his profession as farmer.
Gastric teratomas are rare and mostly benign.
They frequently become evident as a palpable abdominal mass.
A malignant, aggressive solid tumor must be excluded.
We present a 6-month-old male infant with a history of bleeding of the upper gastrointestinal tract.
After in toto excision the histopathology was that of a benign gastric teratoma.
Our method of reading the diagnosis and the subsequent therapy are described.
The aim of this prospective study was to assess the clinical and prognostic relevance of patent foramen ovale - in contrast to risk factors for atherosclerosis and cardioembolic sources - in 208 patients with cerebral ischemic events.
All patients underwent neurological examination (Doppler, CT, NMR) as well as transthoracic and transesophageal echocardiography.
A patent foramen ovale was found in 75 patients (36%).
With regard to risk factors for atherosclerosis patients with closed resp.
patent foramen ovale revealed significant differencies for age, hypertension, diabetes and use of oral contraceptives.
Cardioembolic sources showed significant differencies for atrial fibrillation and atrial septal aneurysm.
Multivariate analysis of risk factors for atherosclerosis and cardioembolic sources revealed hypertension and diabetes as age dependant risk factors in patients with closed foramen ovale.
In patients with patent foramen ovale the use of oral contraceptives was found as an independant risk factor for cerebral ischemic event.
Patients >60 years with cerebral ischemic events had more often a closed foramen ovale.
Dependant on age patients with closed foramen ovale showed a higher frequency of hypertension and diabetes.
In addition these patients revealed more often atrial fibrillation.
Patients with patent foramen ovale had fewer risk factors for atherosclerosis or cardioembolic sources but presented more frequent the use of oral contraceptives or atrial septal aneurysm.
A retrospective study of 86 motorcycle accidents that occurred in the year 1992 is reported.
Examination of the case histories supplemented by telephone conversations yielded the following results: 90.7% of our patients were male and their average age was 28.8 years; the age group between 25 and 30 years was the most frequently involved (27.9%).
Most motorcycle accidents happened during weekend trips out in the summertime.
Special injury patterns were found for injuries of the upper and the lower extremity.
Lower extremity injuries (46%), and especially open tibia fractures (19.7%), were among the most common injuries sustained by motorcyclists in crashes.
Injuries of the upper extremity most frequently took the form of fracture of the distal radius (18.8%).
The average stay in our hospital was 35.4 days.
In 23.4% of cases the patients had to change their job after the accident.
More than half the crashes happened with motorcycles with between 500 and 750 cc stroke volume.
Over a third (34.5%) of the patients had held their driving licences for more than 8 years.
A plea is made for more preventive measures, such as better driving instruction, better road conditions and legislative changes, against motorcycle crashes.
From the aspects of cost and the rate of complications it is reasonable to strive for a surgical treatment as soon as possible after the crash.
Reflex sympathetic dystrophy (RSD) is a syndrome affecting an extremity after a minor trauma or operation.
At the moment there is no consensus about the pathogenesis of RSD.
In 1942 Paul Sudeck suggested that the signs and symptoms of RSD may be provoked by an exaggerated inflammatory response to injury or operation of an extremity.
His theory found no disciples, as most physicians believe that RSD is initiated by an hyperactive sympathetic system.
We performed various clinical and experimental investigations, including the effects of antiinflammatory treatment.
The results of these studies support the theory of Paul Sudeck.
Erectile failure after radical prostatectomy is a common postoperative disorder.
However, nerve-sparing technique provides in about 50-60 % erections sufficient for sexual intercourse.
Damage to the cavernous nerves or vascular injuries are responsible for erectile dysfunction.
Alprostadil is most commonly used for self-injection monotherapy or in combination with other vasoactive drugs.
Intraurethral administration of alprostadil failed to reproduce promising early results.
The oral drug Sildenafil showed to be effective in patients with partial erections, however, it failed to work after non nerve-sparing radical prostatectomy.
Negative pressure devices and penile prosthesis can be considered as alternative therpeutic options.
Autologous N. suralis transplantation during radical prostatectomy might further improve erection rates in the near future.
Pregnancy causes substantial changes in the cardiovascular system: cardiac output (40%-50%) and blood volume (40%) increase whereas systemic peripheral resistance and arterial pressure decrease.
The rise in progesterone and estrogen levels accompanying pregnancy stimulates the renin-angiotension-aldosterone system.
Increased prostaglandin production follows renin activation; simultaneously, the arterial vessels show diminished angiotension sensitivity.
The result is pronounced vasodilatation.
Heart disease remains the most important nonobstetric cause of maternal death.
The physiological changes in the cardiovascular system during pregnancy influence cardiac diseases in different ways.
Pregnancy, labor, and delivery appear to be well tolerated in gravidae with an atrial septal defect, ventricular septal defect, and patents ductus arteriosus.
Sometimes congestive heart failure occurs and appropriate medical therapy is necessary.
Pregnant women with uncorrected cyanotic congenital heart disease (Eisenmenger's syndrome, tetralogy of Fallot) constitute a high-risk group because of right ventricular insufficiency and hypoxic attacks.
The consequences for anaesthesia in parturients with congenital heart disease are discussed.
The symptoms of acquired mitral or aortic stenosis are aggravated by the physiological changes in the cardiovascular system during pregnancy; the clinical symptoms of valve insufficiency are ameliorated by vasodilatation.
Peripartum cardiomyopathy clinically shows similar features to idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
The basis of treatment is the same as that of congestive heart failure, with the therapeutic spectrum ranging from diet to heart transplantation.
Women with hypertrophic cardiomyopathy tolerate pregnancy, labor, and delivery surprisingly well.
Vaginal delivery is possible, but epidural anaesthesia is contraindicated.
Hypertensive disorders associated with pregnancy are classified into three groups: chronic, treatment, and preeclamptic hypertension.
Whereas chronic and transient hypertension do not affect the outcome of pregnancy appreciably, pre-eclampsia presents a potential danger to mother and fetus.
Pre-eclamptic hypertension is accompanied by low cardiac output and plasma volume.
An upregulation of angiotension receptors enhances vascular reactivity, with the consequence of high peripheral resistance.
For antihypertensive therapy hydralazine, -methyldopa, and magnesium sulfate are the drugs of choice.
A generalised recommendation of anaesthesia for the pre-eclamptic gravida cannot be made because both general and epidural anaesthesia have risks of severe side effects.
CT with multiplanar reconstruction of the jaws (DentaScan) is the method of choice for the radiographic assessment of the mandible and maxilla.
It is instrumental in delineating the relationship between bony lesions and the adjacent anatomy.
Therefore, this technique allows precise evaluation of the intricate details of the oral cavity.
Using it, distinct characterization of pathology including infectious, metabolic, congenital and neoplastic lesions can be obtained.
The histopathology of bone marrow in primary myelodysplastic syndromes (MDS) is described, with reference to the FAB classification.
Variants such as hypoplastic, thrombocythemic and fibrotic MDS are recognized from their histopathology and must be incorporated in the FAB classification.
The clinical significance of hypoplastic, thrombocythemic and fibrotic variants is illustrated by the survival rates and leukemic transformation in these patients.
Histopathological classification according to the FAB system corresponds with cytological classification, as proven by the distribution of the subtypes, blood values, leukemic transformation rates and survival times.
Finally it is even possible to elaborate a prognostic score for survival based on histological features of diagnostic biopsies, which emphasizes the importance of histopathological examination of bone marrow in MDS patients.
A 58-year-old man developed an extensive pilomatrical carcinoma in the left axilla.
Clinically, a squamous cell carcinoma was suspected.
Histological examination revealed the presence of proliferating basaloid cells with many atypical mitoses and mass necrosis infiltrating into the subcutaneous tissue.
The tumor was removed by micrographic surgery with a 2 cm safety margin.
Histological examination of 2 regional lymph nodes as well as further diagnostic procedures ruled out metastases.
We review the clinical and histopathological differences between pilomatricoma and pilomatrical carcinoma, as well as the published cases of the malignant variant.
Introduction: Recent studies evaluating lay people and health care professionals about their process-quality checking the carotid pulse demonstrated poor diagnostic accuracy and more time needed than suggested in international guidelines for CPR.
So far there was no scientifically prooved data about the quality of checking the breathing.
Study objective was the evaluation of the  effectiveness of checking the breathing in  an emergency situation with four different groups: lay people (L), EMT /Paramedics (E), medical students (M), physicians (P).
Taking into account the increase in worldwide human migration, leprosy is of growing importance in the differential diagnosis of dermatological diseases encountered in Central Europe.
We report on the case of a young man from Ghana who developed hypopigmented maculae and plaques on his trunk and proximal limbs.
The diagnosis of lepromatous leprosy could be made in consideration of the histological pattern of infiltrating leucocytes and detection of numerous acid-fast mycobacteria on skin biopsy.
The results of the physical examination as well as routine laboratory and immunological parameters were consistent with this form of leprosy.
Due to glucose-6-phosphate-dehydrogenase deficiency, treatment with dapsone was contraindicated.
With high-dose rifampicin and clofazimine therapy, the skin changes cleared over the course of 11 months following a leprosy reaction type II (erythema nodosum leprosum) that developed during a phase of discontinued therapy due to low patient compliance.
In the last few years two placebo controlled studies (European Cooperative Acute Stroke Study and National Institute of Neurological Disorders and Stroke Study) analyzed the effect of systemic thrombolytic therapy with recombinant tissue plasminogen activator (rt-PA) in acute hemispheric stroke.
Both studies showed a positive longtime effect for the rt-PA treated patients.
The number of symptomatic intracerebral hemorrhage was higher in the rt-PA treated groups.
The results determine possible clinical or neuroradiological predictors of intracerebral hemorrhage associated with rt-PA therapy.
The role of enteroviral myocardial infection in the development of dilated cardiomyopathy could only be substantiated after the introduction of molecular biological techniques (polymerase chain reaction, in-situ hybridization) in virological diagnostics of dilated cardiomyopathy.
By using histological and especially immunohistological techniques for the detection of myocardial inflammation in patients with the tentative clinical diagnosis of dilated cardiomyopathy, a differentiation between inflammatory cardiomyopathy and idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy on the basis of the WHO classification 1995 (31) was made.
Inflammatory cardiomyopathy is defined by myocarditis in association with cardiac dysfunction and is diagnosed by established histological and especially immunohistological techniques.
The combination of histological, immunohistological, and molecularbiological techniques enabled a subgroup analysis of the incidence of enteroviral myocardial RNA in patients with inflammatory cardiomyopathy in comparison to patients with idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
The Intended-Dynamic Group Therapy, until the unity almost unknown in West-Germany, represented the most important form of therapy in the former GDR.
Its development, its conception of the relevant relationship between group-dynamic and psychoanalytic concepts and in particular its reception of psychoanalytic concepts are discussed.
This raises the question of defining the position of this therapy form with the focus on the controverse about its proximity to psychoanalytic therapeutical concepts.
Even if we take into account that in the GDR there were very reduced possibilities to articulate psychoanalytic and particularly drive concepts, in our view the Intended-Dynamic Group Therapy cannot be considered as a psychoanalytical form of therapy.
It represents a specific therapeutical development of the former GDR which is strongly oriented at social norms.
It is first of all oriented at the attitude change reached by the group, that means, at the manifest, conscious behaviour of the patient and therefore focusses at the normative level of behaviour regulation in groups in the sense of interactional group therapy.
The authors view this form of therapy as a "historical compromise" in the field of psychotherapy under the circumstances of the former GDR and in this way they take into account both its advantages and its weaknesses.
In a prospective study of central fractures of the talus, radiological data (plain radiography, CT, MRI) were scrutinized in terms of correlation with histological findings (biopsy taken at time of screw removal).
The study looked at nine fractures in eight patients aged 14 - 48 years.
There was one fracture of Hawkins type I, one fracture of type II, four fractures of type III, and three corpus fractures.
All were operated on within 24 h after injury; seven had screw fixation, two had adaptation with K wires.
The patients were kept non-weight-bearing for 14 - 53 weeks.
Duration of follow-up was 2 years or more in all but one patient.
In the final radiograph the talus was intact in four patients, while four showed a partial avascular collapse; in one patient, a partial collapse was doubtful.
Histology taken 16 - 52 weeks after injury showed osteocyte-free original bone in all cases, with deposition of new bone varying in extent.
Hawkins sign was partially positive in six patients, positive in one, and negative in one.
Decalcification as well as fracture healing can be better followed by CT than by plain radiography.
MRI appeared normal in five patients, partially pathological in two, and abnormal in one.
A positive Hawkins sign and normal signal behavior can be seen as prognostically favorable signs.
However, in the case of a central talus fracture, even with a favorable course osteonecrosis of at least a part of the talus with gradual replacement by new bone occurred.
Vascularization of the central talus seems to be disturbed more frequently than is reflected radiologically.
Purpose: To assess the value of functional magnetic resonance urography for the noninvasive postoperative evaluation of renal transplants.
Methods: A saturation inversion projection sequence allows the selective imaging of strongly T 1 weighted signal from the MR contrast agent.
A coronal slab leads to images comparable to conventional urography which can be acquired as a sequence with four images per minute.
Results: 15 patients with urologic questionable findings after renal transplantation were studied.
FMRU revealed in 6 patients normal findings, in 6 moderate dilatation of the renal pelvis without any urodynamic relevant obstruction.
3 pathologic findings, ureteral leak, ureteropelvic-junction obstruction and ureteral stenosis were diagnosed and consequently surgically treated.
The imaging quality in all studies was diagnostic and urologically relevant.
Conclusion: FMRU can be used as a noninvasive technique for the assessment of renal transplant in cases with suspicion of complication in the excretory system.
The infection after intramedullary nailing is a severe complication, which is hard to eradicate.
The results of reaming the intramedullary canal after removal of the infected nail were evaluated in our investigation.
From 1984 to 1991 fifty-five patients with infected intramedullary nails of the lower extremity were included in this trial.
Twenty-one patients had an infection of the femur.
Thirty-four patients had a primary infection of the nail, twenty-one patients had multiple operations with periods of infection prior to nailing.
All patients had signs of a chronic osteitis and sinus formation.
At the time of the follow-up the success of the procedure was evaluated regarding recurrence of infection, range of motion of the extremity and patient comfort.
The mean time of observation was 10,1  +/-  4,9 years.
All patients with initially infected intramedullary nails had no recurrence of the infection, compared to 62 % of those with multiple operations prior to nailing.
At the time of the follow up all fractures had healed.
85 % of the patients performed full weight bearing.
32 patients (91 %) had good or excellent ROM of the adjacent joints.
The discussion about the therapy of the posterior cruciate ligament persists.
Conservative treatment, augmented repair, and reconstruction with autografts are discussed.
From 1993 to 1997, 49 patients with posterior cruciate ligament rupture had repair Trevira ligament augmentation of 3 mm.
There were 21 isolated and 28 combined ruptures.
In 5 cases bony avulsions were refixed by screw or additional hook plate.
Investigation of 36 patients, in 15 cases with isolated ligamentous ruptures was made.
Osseous avulsion had good results in all cases.
Isolated posterior cruciate ligament rupture showed good stability in 7 of 15 cases and instability of 2 + in 8 cases.
The medial range Lysholm score was 76.8 (+/- 21.6), the OAK score showed 2 very good and 5 good results, 3 fair and 5 bad results.
Using the IKDC score led to 3 very good and 4 good results, 2 fair and 6 bad results.
Using subjective criteria, 10 patients described results as very good or good, 2 fair and 3 bad.
Posterior cruciate ligament rupture with additional knee injury or fracture of the leg showed bad results in 60 % of cases, and good or fair results in only 40 %.
We think augmented repair of fresh injury of the posterior cruciate ligament can be used as an alternative therapy to reconstruction with autograft.
Through cooperation between the German Contact Dermatitis Research Group (DKG) and the Information Network of Departments of Dermatology (IVDK), results of standardized patch tests performed by the participating centres are centrally recorded in Germany.
For this study, data from 24 departments of dermatology (19678 patients) were evaluated retrospectively and separately for 1995 and 1996.
With decreasing frequency, nickel, fragrance mix, balsam of peru, and thimerosal yielded positive reactions most often; suprisingly high numbers of positive reactions were also seen with amerchol L-101 and palladium.
Differentiated lists of allergens were compiled for 1995, referring to subgroups of patients (defined by gender, age, localization of eczema, geographical region, occupation, sensitization) and particular problems.
In men, percentages of positive reactions were markedly lower for nickel, fragrance mix and balsam of peru than in women.
Younger patients reacted more often to thimerosal and older ones to topical medical preparations.
Medical allergens were also often positive in patients with leg eczema, whereas occupational allergens were found more frequently in patients with hand eczema.
A comparison of positive reactions obtained in distinct geographical regions was problematic because of differences between test populations.
The spectrum of allergens found in officeworkers was similar to that of the whole test population.
Patients with positive reactions to nickel and fragrance mix had more positive reactions to unrelated allergens than the total test population.
Sex- and age-adjusted frequencies of sensitization revealed a decrease in reactions to nickel and an increase in reactions to mercury allergens from 1995 to 1996.
The clinical relevance of mercury reactions was often not apparent.
Differentiated lists of allergens can be used to improve the quality of diagnostic and prophylactic procedures in allergic contact dermatitis.
Intramuscular injections of botulinum toxin (BT) induce a localized, long-lasting paresis of the target muscle that can be graded by the BT dose administered and that is free of major side effects.
With this profile, BT can be used for symptomatic treatment of various disorders caused by pathological muscle hyperactivities.
These disorders occur frequently in patients in institutions for neurological rehabilitation.
They are difficult to treat with conventional methods, can cause major suffering and induce substantial costs for our health care system.
In the present study we therefore sought to delineate the use of BT in rehabilitative neurology.
Regardless of the etiology of the particular muscle hyperactivity syndrome, five main indication groups are identified: (1) improvement of function of the hyperactive muscles; (2) relief of pain in the hyperactive muscles; (3) improvement of patient care; (4) avoidance of sequelae in joints, tendons, ligaments, and teeth; (5) various special indications.
Myocardial infarction shows a circadian pattern with a maximum in the early morning hours.
In patients with sleep-related breathing disorders (SRBD), it is assumed that apnea-associated changes of hemodynamics, blood gases, and rheology lead to a higher frequency of myocardial infarction during sleep.
This investigation analyzes the circadian pattern of myocardial infarction in patients with and without SRBD.
Currently no serological marker for the monitoring of uveal melanoma and its metastases is available.
The novel tumorassociated antigen Melanoma inhibitory activity (MIA) is expressed in the uveal melanoma and it's metastatic lesions.
Persistent atrial fibrillation (AF) is associated with shortened action potential duration (APD) and reduced atrial refractoriness.
Remodeling of ion currents responsible for AP morphology has been proposed as a major mechanism in persistent AF.
In the present study we investigated the activity of the cardiac L-type Ca2+ channel and the mRNA transcription of the cardiac L-type Ca2+ channel subunits in patients with persistent AF compared to patients in sinus rhythm (SR).
Right atrial appendages of 10 patients in SR and of 5 patients with AF were used for myocyte isolations to record L-type Ca2+ currents (ICa,L) by the patch-clamp technique.
Right atrial appendages of 16 patients in SR and of 5 patients with AF served as sources for determining the mRNA expression of the L-type Ca2+ channel 1c-, 2/-, a-, and b/c-subunits by semiquantitative RT-PCR.
ICa,L density was reduced by 70% (p < 0.001) in AF patients compared to the sinus rhythm group.
Cell sizes, expressed as cell capacitance, were identical in both groups.
mRNA expressions of the 1c-subunit and the b/c-subunits were reduced in AF patients by 18.9% (p < 0.05) and 77.7% (p < 0.005), respectively, while mRNA transcriptions of the 2/- and the a-subunits were not significantly different between SR and AF patients.
A decrease in the availability of functional L-type Ca2+ channels in AF patients, due to reduced 1c-subunit and substantial lack of b/c-subunit transcription seems to contribute to the shortening pf APD and refractory periods in AF, thereby favoring increased atrial excitation rate and perpetuation of AF.
34 patients aged 3 months to 20years underwent transcatheter-occlusion of their patent ductus arteriosus with detachable coils (Cook).
Eight patients had a residual ductus after previous implantation of a Rashkind-occluder; 7 patients had various other cardiac malformations in addition.
Only 6 patients had a large ductus with a diameter between 3 and 4 mm; all had systolic-diastolic murmurs.
All other patients had ductus-diameters below 3 mm; three of them had systolic-diastolic murmurs, 17 had systolic murmurs, and 8 patients had no murmur at all.
The ductus was closed in 24 patients using artrial access only, in 6 patients via a venous, and in 4 patients both via venous and arterial catheterization.
One coil was used in 23 patients, 2 coils in 9, and 3 coils in 2 patients.
There were no complications of the intervention.
Within 24 hours 31 patients (93%) had complete closure of the ductus and 32 patients (94%) after 6 months.
Coil-embolisation of the persistent ductus is a quick, safe and cheap method to close a ductus and has clear advantages compared to an operation.
The volume of preoperative screening investigations for outpatient anaesthesia ranges from few, selectively ordered investigations to extensive routine diagnostic procedures.
It seem appropriate to reevaluate benefit and efficacy of routine preoperative assessment programs.
The purpose of preoperative diagnostic is to assess the risk of anaesthesia and surgery for the patient.
As shown by a number of studies, preoperative screening investigations seldom disclose new pathological findings of clinical relevance.
Abnormal laboratory results in otherwise healthy patients rarely alter the anaesthetic management of the patient and are not related to perioperative complications.
Extensive use of costly diagnostic procedures considerably increases health care budgets.
A more selective approach to order preoperative investigations promises considerable savings.
To achieve costeffective evalulation an efficient organisation of properative assessment must be established to avoid costly delay and on-day-of-surgery-cancellations.
There is no medicolegal obligation to perform routine diagnostic testing.
The anaesthetist must be sufficiently informed in time to assess the perioperative risk of the patient and to alter anaesthetic management as necessary.
According to the presented studies a clinical history and a thorough physical examination represent an effective method of screening for the presence of disease.
Careful medical history evaluation and physical examination can avoid extensive investigations in apparently healthy individuals and the latter should only be ordered if indicated.
The botryoid odontogenic cyst (BOC) is considered a rare multilocular variant of the lateral periodontal cyst.
The origin of the BOC can be seen in aberrant odontogenic tissue.
The BOC is found especially in the premolar region of the mandible, as well as in the frontal region of the maxilla of patients aged between 60 and 70 years.
Most of the 11 published articles of BOC have shown high rates of recurrence.
Histopathologically the BOC is marked by multilocular cysts lined by a thin, nonkeratinized epithelium.
Clusters of glycogen-rich epithelial cells may be noted in nodular thickenings of the cyst lining.
For the clinician, the differentiation of the BOC from the keratocyst and ameloblastoma is relevant.
One case of a large BOC (65-year-old male, BOC regio 33-45, diameter 5 cm, radiographically and histologically multilocular) is presented with a review of the literature, including the therapeutic management, and the possible diagnostic criteria are discussed.
The immunohistochemically determined expression of cytokeratin (CK) 13 implicates the histogenetic origin of the BOC from the squamous epithelium of the oral cavity and excludes the origin from the small salivary glands.
The expression of CK 19 and the lack of expression of p53, as well as the higher proliferation rate of the basal epithelial cell layer by the BOC, may be useful for distinction between the keratocyst.
Within the framework of a study on vocational rehabilitation of the mentally ill, we examined 83 schizophrenic outpatients enrolled in a work therapy program.
The course of illness and rehabilitation was documented over a 3-year period by means of annual follow-up examinations.
The sample comprised 44 men and 39 women with an average age of 35 years (SD +/- 8,5).
The majority were chronically ill patients with a history of frequent and long psychiatric hospitalization.
After 3 years, 22% of the patients were integrated into the general labor market, 26% had sheltered employment, 23% were still in work therapy, and 29% were unemployed.
Besides the patients' subjective expectations, early introduction of rehabilitative measures and a favourable course of illness were found to be predictors of a successful rehabilitation leading to vocational integration.
Outpatient work therapy is a contemporary, effective organizational form of sociotherapy.
It may contribute to improved vocational competence and integration, reduced psychiatric hospitalization and stabilized psychopathology.
Objective: Based on personal observations the neuromuscular blocking potency of atracurium was supposed to be diminished in purulent intrathoracic diseases.
This hypothesis was tested in a prospective clinical trial.
Aim of study: Goal of this survey is to give an overview of anaesthesia for caesarean section in Germany.
Ultrasound contrast agent is used in color Doppler flow imaging for signal enhancement in perfused vessels.
We present our experience with its use in the head and neck area and the results obtained.
Up until now, 30 patients with carcinomas of the oral cavity or the maxillary sinus, tumors of the mandible and metastatic or inflammatory lymph nodes have been examined.
Conventional B-scan sonography was supplemented by non-contrast color Doppler flow imaging.
Depending on the indication, 2.5 g Levovist in bolus or 4 g fractionated was injected intravenously in a concentration of 300 or 400 mg/ml.
The administration of the contrast agent was tolerated by all patients without any side effects and in all cases led to a remarkable enhancement of the Doppler signals.
About 15 to 30 s after injection, an enhancement in perfused vessels was detected.
The fractioned injection of 4 g led to a lengthening of signal enhancement up to more than 10 min and to the possibility of examining more parts with a single application of contrast agent.
In 64% of the lymph nodes, vessels could only be identified with the administration of Levovist.
The general vessel topography could be better evaluated in 83% of the cases.
The lymph-node-supplying vessels were identified in 8 of 11 patients after the injection of contrast media.
Additional information, which was gained in 17 patients, increased the certainty of diagnosis or of the therapeutic concept.
In three cases, the examinations with the signal enhancer resulted in a change in therapy.
By applying signal enhancer in color Doppler sonography the fields of examination in the head and neck areas can be expanded.
Non-syndromic neurosensory recessive deafness (NSRD) is one of the most common human sensory disorders.
Mutations in the connexin 26 gene have been established as a major cause of inherited and sporadic non-syndromic deafness in different populations.
Laser-induced thermotherapy is an in situ ablation method for the local treatment of liver tumors.
The basic prerequisite for induction of adequate treatment volumes for clinical use was the development of a thermostable application system.
In an ex vivo test series, the specially developed application system (diffuser tip) with 5760 J had a higher thermic loading capacity than the Ringmode applicator with 4200 J, thus enabling the induction of significantly larger lesions with a volume of 7.6 cm3.
The results of a further in vivo test series demonstrated that the lesions were subject to a four-phase connective-tissue organization within a 6-month period.
Furthermore, the same laser energy (4200 J) was associated with a significantly lower lesion volume of 2.5 cm3 in the in vivo than in the ex vivo test series.
The influence of liver perfusion on the inducible lesion volume was examined in a further animal experimental study.
By temporarily interrupting hepatic blood perfusion (Pringle's maneuver) during laser application, the effective volume could be increased to 50.3 cm3 (P < 0.01) using an optical beam splitter.
These results show that the technical prerequisites for reliable clinical application of laser-induced thermotherapy have been fulfilled.
A total of 222 urogenital specimens were investigated with a commercially available polymerase chain reaction (Amplicor test) for the direct detection of Chlamydia trachomatis.
The results were compared with those yielded by the conventional cell culture technique.
Using cell culture a urogenital C. trachomatis infection could be detected in 72 of 222 patients.
The Amplicor test yielded a positive result in 83.
Referred to the detection rate of the Amplicor test and that of the cell culture, sensitivity was 91.2% for the test sensitivity and 79.1% for the cell culture.
The specificity of both techniques was 100% when the specimens for which neither both nor either one of the tests gave positive results were considered.
In accordance with other studies, this study suggests that tests based on nucleic acid amplification will supersede cell cultures as the gold standard for the detection of C. trachomatis and also become the method of choice in routine diagnosis of urogenital chamydial infections.
Incidence and clinical significance of cardiopulmonary complications of acute cerebral lesions are still unclear.
Neurogenic pulmonary edema (NPE) is characterized as an acute, protein-rich lung edema occurring shortly after cerebral lesions associated with an acute rise of intracranial pressure.
NPE is infrequently diagnosed, usually in association with head trauma.
Pathophysiological mechanisms include a rise of the pulmonary vascular hydrostatic pressure either due to sympathetic innervation with pulmonary vasoconstriction or increased left-atrial pressure following systemic arterial hypertension or an increase in pulmonary capillary permeability.
In contrast to NPE, cardiac complications are frequently observed, most consistently in patients with subarachoid hemorrhage.
Typical ECG changes are repolarization abnormalities, similar to those observed in coronary heart disease, and cardiac arrhythmias.
The CK-MB may be slightly elevated; echocardiographic findings show a depressed left-ventricular function.
Pathological examination reveals myofibrillar necrosis.
Cardiac complications are explained with overactivity of the sympathetic innervation and high levels of circulating catecholamines.
For adequate treatment, close cardiac monitoring is required in all patients with acute cerebral lesions.
Benign, non-parasitic liver cysts are usually asymptomatic and found incidentally by abdominal ultrasound or CT scan.
We present the case of a 68-year-old patient who showed obstructive jaundice due to a hemorrhagic liver cyst compressing the choledochal duct.
Due to the location of the cyst in the porta hepatis with partial compression of central liver vessels and the meanwhile organized hematoma, operative therapy was preferred in order to prevent secondary complications such as portal vein thrombosis and to exclude a malignant neoplasm.
This review summarizes briefly pathophysiology, clinical definitions, pathogenesis, risk factors, diagnostic procedures and principles of therapy and prophylaxis of ischemic stroke.
Ischemic stroke is defined as a localized lack of cerebral perfusion mainly due to cardioembolic or arterial-embolic occlusion of cerebral arteries or hemodynamic or microangiographic reduction of cerebral blood flow.
We focused on pathophysiological mechanisms with potential clinical relevance as the role of oxygen and glucose concentration, the therapeutic time window, the role of excitatory neurotransmitters, Ca2+-influx, free radicals, and the development of ischemic brain edema.
Based on this data the need of an urgent initiation of diagnostic workup and therapy is emphasized.
This includes the early basic management with monitoring of blood pressure, ECG, oxygen and blood glucose concentration, and the balance of the water and electrolyte supply.
Since specific therapeutic and prophylactic interventions are based on an exact diagnosis with respect to the pathogenesis, the need of an urgent diagnostic workup including clinical examination, laboratory baseline, vascular ultrasound, cranial CT-scan, ECG, and echocardiography is emphazised.
Based on these results appropriate management of certain pathogenetic stroke subgroups is discussed.
New data about the effectiveness of basic care, treatment of edema, neuroprotective agents, and thrombolysis is presented.
Indications for the therapy with intravenous heparin, vitamin K-antagonists, antiplatelet drugs, and surgical procedures are summarized.
Longitudinal osteocutaneous defects of the sternal region including the caudal third were reconstructed in 15 patients during a 3-year period by using the "vertical (VRAM)- and transverse rectus abdominis muscle" (TRAM) flap.
The majority of the defects resulted from chronic osteomyelitis after previous cardiothoracic surgery or were due to former therapy of breast cancer.
Three VRAM/TRAM flaps were primarily transferred as free flaps with microvascular anastomosis in the axilla region.
Nine out of 12 pedicled VRAM or TRAM flaps required an additional microvascular anastomosis because of imminent venous or arterial insufficency ("supercharging").
Therefore, operative technique and operating time of the pedicled and free flap for reconstruction of longitudinal sternal defects are comparable.
Adequate reconstruction and rehabilitation was achieved in 11 cases.
In 2 patients revision and partial secondary defect coverage was required.
Two male patients died postoperatively due to their preexisting condition.
The introduction of joints in unilateral fixators enables these for multiple deformity corrections.
Lengthening and shortening is achieved by changing the length of the fixator telescope.
Axial corrections are performed by additive or subtractive techniques using uniplanar joints or by angulation procedures.
Translation is done by direct movements of the bone fragments or by metaphyseal "double angulation".
Derotation preferably is done as an acute procedure or in the "ring part" of a hybrid frame.
Unilateral fixators are used to correct and temporarily stabilize until the correction is held by the nintramedullary nail.
Pathomorphology in the preterm infant represents an interaction of morphological organ immaturity and neonatal management with their respective sequelae.
Background: Morphological changes in the corneal surface after PRK may result not only in refraction fluctuations and reduction in visual acuity, but also in changes of contrast sensitivity.
The aim of this study was to investigate whether PRK has an influence on contrast sensitivity with and without glare with a subsequent effect on the ability to drive cars.
Calcifying obliterative atherosclerosis isolated within the descending thoracic aorta causing subtotal vascular occlusion was associated with symptoms such as in aortic coarctation in a 56-year-old patient.
Remarkable in this unique case is the atypical and isolated manifestation of atherosclerotic disease within the thoracic aorta, as well as the tumorous extent of luminal calcification.
Differential diagnostic considerations had to include calcifying tumor of the aorta, remnants after aortitis or secondary calcified aortic dissection.
The osteoplastic frontal sinus surgery with obliteration of the sinus has been established in the therapy of frontal sinus diseases that can not be drainaged permanently or healed through an endonasal access.
The obliteration of the frontal sinus is endangered in cases of multiple fracturing of the posterior frontal sinus wall or if it has been destroyed by an inflammatory process.
In these problematic cases obliteration bears the danger of complications and cranialization of the frontal sinus is therefore the method of choice.
We review 8 patients who were operated on using the cranialization technique.
Indications for surgery were a combined fracture of the anterior and posterior frontal sinus wall (3), a pyocele of the front sinus with extensive destruction of the posterior wall (4) and a large osteoma of the posterior frontal sinus wall (1).
The frontal sinus was exposed through a coronal incision, the mucosa and the posterior wall were completely removed and the frontal sinus obliterated with fat tissue.
The anterior sinus wall was replaced after obliteration of the sinus or reconstructed with calvarian bone transplants.
The follow up period was 1.8 years (11 months to 8 years).
All patients underwent postoperatively a clinical ENT-examination and radiological assessment by CT-scan or MRI.
The overall functional and esthetic outcome was excellent.
There were no serious complications nor any recurrence.
The cranialization of the frontal sinus is a reliable and safe variation of the classical osteoplastic frontal sinus surgery with fat obliteration.
We present the case of an infant with Waterhouse-Friderichsen syndrome, in whom keloids developed at the sites of intracutanous bleeding within 6 months after the illness.
Spinocerebellar ataxia type 7 (SCA7) belongs to the category of autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxias (ADCA).
The clinical picture is characterised by progressive ataxia and macular degeneration.
Other common signs are slow saccades, external ophthalmoplegia, and pyramidal tract signs.
The disease is caused by the expansion of an unstable CAG trinucleotide repeat in the gene for ataxin 7 on chromosome 3.
SCA7 is a rare disorder.
The first case in Germany was described only recently.
We report two additional patients, father and son, with the molecular genetic diagnosis of SCA7.
The father carries a trinucleotide expansion of 42 CAG repeats, the son 51.
Normal alleles range from 7 to 35 CAG repeats.
Both patients show the typical picture with progressive ataxia and macular degeneration.
We found a pronounced anticipation (earlier disease onset in subsequent generations), which is highly characteristic of CAG repeat disorders.
In the following contribution the under-proportional participation rate of older workers in vocational training is analysized.
Regarding the changes concerning the organiszation of vocational training to more job-integrated, self-directed and computerbased learning the consequences for training opportunities, motivation to learn and performance possibilities as well as institutional basic conditions to optimize the participation of elderly workers in further training are discussed.
Tick-borne encephalitis (TBE) is the most severe arbovirus disease transmitted by ticks.
The mortality of the central European form is 0.7-2%.
Active immunisation is recommended for endemic regions.
We report on 4 patients with TBE aquired in Middle-Hessen between 1994 and 1997 (2 in 1997).
After repeated CSF and serum testing the TBE-specific antibodies were found in all 4 cases.
In one case there was also evidence for a prior infection with borrelia burgdorferi.
The results of the initial CSF-analysis were atypical in 2 cases (high cell count of 136 cells/mm3, total protein up to 1.5 g/l).
The endemic region for TBE has expanded in northern direction into Middle-Hessen, a region in which Lyme borreliosis is also endemic.
Thus, true double infections are possible.
This and the initially frequently atypical CSF-findings make the differential diagnosis difficult.
Therefore, repetitive CSF and blood examinations are recommended.
Nedocromil sodium and cromolyn sodium are non-steroidal, anti-inflammatory drugs for the treatment of asthma.
Although they are chemically different, there are many similarities in their mechanism of action.
In provocation tests they have equal efficacy on some tests (allergen, exercise), but nedocromil sodium has greater effect on neuronal mechanisms such as So2 challenge.
Very few studies compared the two drugs.
In children, only one study was done, showing that twice daily nedocromil is as effective as four times daily cromolyn sodium.
Thus twice daily administration is one advantage of nedocromil, the other being proven effect of steroid- sparing, which has not been shown with cromolyn sodium.
Both drugs are recommended as first-line agents in mild persistent asthma.
Background: We evaluated in this retrospective study the impact of our diagnostic and therapeutic regimens - as illustrated by typical clinical pictures - on the frequency and prognostic values of postkeratoplasty complications in herpes eyes.
The evaluation of brain tumor recurrence and therapy-induced benign changes following surgery and/or irradiation is a diagnostic challenge for imaging methods based on either morphology (cCT/MRI) or function (SPECT/PET).
Current literature and the present data of our own patients demonstrate the diagnostic efficiency of IMT-SPECT and FDG-PET in the detection of recurrence and in-vivo grading.
Thirty-nine patients suspected of brain tumor recurrence at follow-up were studied by FDG-PET and IMT-SPECT.
Thirty-four of 39 patients showed recurrences; in 12 cases even a change in the grade of malignancy was observed.
All high-grade recurrences could be confirmed by either methods.
IMT-SPECT showed a higher sensitivity in detecting low-grade tumors at recurrence.
In contrast to IMT-SPECT, FDG-PET supports sufficient in-vivo grading.
Both methods can be used to differentiate between tumor recurrence and radionecrosis.
In conclusion the results of our study demonstrate the efficiency of IMT-SPECT and FDG-PET in confirming recurrences and determining the actual tumor grade.
A 22-year-old male presented with a submandibular cystic mass in the ENT Clinic of Berlin-Buch.
Histopathology revealed a dystopic papillary carcinoma in a thyroglossal duct cyst.
Worldwide only about 150 cases are known.
We describe our diagnostic and therapeutic procedures employed and included tumor excision, bilateral neck dissections and total thyroidectomy.
No abnormalities in the thyroid gland but a metastatic carcinoma was uncovered in an ipsilateral lymph node in the jugular foramen area.
A preoperative 99 Tc-thyroid scan and MRI study had not shown any evidence for a malignant tumor.
The therapeutic approach advocated in literature is controversial but the intraoperative findings in our patient supported our decision to choose a relatively radical but not mutilating therapy.
Transforming growth factor-1 (TGF-1) is a pleiotrophic growth factor in carcinogenesis and regulars multiple cell functions.
We wanted to evaluate the diagnostic meaning of TGF-1 plasma levels in patients with a biopsy proven prostate cancer.
The TGF-1 blood level was analysed in 394 patients.
In 242 patients (group I) the blood was taken before any prostate manipulation and biopsy.
The TGF-1 plasma concentrations were almost similar in the group of patients with a prostate cancer (n = 157) and patients with a benign prostate hyperplasia (n = 85; 14 258 pg/ml versus 14 658 pg/ml, SD 10 516 pg/ml).
In 152 patients the blood was taken 6-12 months after radical prostatectomy (group II).
There was no significant difference between the patients with a PSA-progress and without PSA-progress after.
Our results suggest that TGF-1 plasma levels can not be used to distinguish between patients with prostate cancer and benign prostate hyperplasia.
The aim of this study was to compare the psychological stress of patients with different forms of immediate type hypersensitivity and urticaria.
Moreover, the patients' motivation for different forms of psychological treatment was assessed and an indication for psychosocial support was defined.
228 consecutive inpatients with insect venom allergies (ins), food intolerance (food), drug hypersensitivities (dru) and urticaria (urt) were evaluated by validated questionnaires regarding psychological strain and motivation for psychosocial treatments.
Patients with food intolerance and urticaria showed significantly elevated psychological stress and higher motivation for psychosocial support as compared to those with insect venom allergies and drug intolerance.
Patient education was the favourite technique for the patients (food 78%, urt 57%, dru 24%, ins 17%), followed by relaxation treatment.
The most important predictors for the motivation were the wish for self-responsibility, a feeling of helplessness and social limitations.
If strong indication criteria are applied, psychosocial support is indicated in only small subgroups of each patient group.
In spite of that, the management of allergic disease should consider the potential need for psychosocial support.
The definition of endocrine disrupters is not very sharp.
At present all non-physiologic substances which bind to steroid receptors, are defined as endocrine disrupters of which the best studied are estrogenic in nature.
Many pesticides or insecticides or their metabolites have estrogenic activity and pollute our surface water.
Here they may cause severe estrogenization of aquatic life.
Only traces of these substances are demonstrable in drinking water.
On the other hand, weak estrogens present in plastic ware may be ingested by men and therefore be potentially harmful for human health.
On the other hand, many plants produce socalled'hyto-estrogens', particularly soy products are rich in phyto-estrogens but their high consumption in Asian populations are most likely the reason for reduced occurrence of breast cancer.
Many plant extracts used for human medication also contain phyto-estrogens and are beneficial in the treatment of climacteric complaints.
Hence, not all endocrine disruptors must be harmful to human health, in fact, some of them (clearly phyto-estrogens) may have beneficial effects.
Germany's new Protection against infection Act (Infektionsschutzgesetz) will take effect on January 1, 2001.
It will result in an increase of notifications on reportable infections.
Counties and states have to adjust the infrastructure of their reportable disease notification systems to meet the demands of the new legislation.
An increased demand for human resources at the non-medical staff level is anticipated.
Continuing education programs for medical and non-medical staff at public health offices are mandatory.
Physicians in private practice, hospitals and diagnostic laboratories and leaders of nursing homes are target groups for special information.
A timely review and epidemiological evaluation of all notifications forwarded by county health offices has to be performed at the state level.This is a prerogative for immediate response in case of non-localized increases in reported disease incidence.
The author advocates the development of an epidemiological rapid reaction scheme (epidemiological fire brigade) in which public health physicians at the county, state, and federal level cooperate in a gradual response to outbreak situations according to actual demand.
We report on an 8 year old boy and a 12 year old girl with intermittent peranal loss of blood and mucus, impaired defecation and recurrent abdominal pain.
On endoscopy isolated ulcers were seen in the rectum only, whereas the colonic mucosa appeared to be normal macroscopically and microscopically.
Biopsies from the borders of the ulcers revealed a hyperplasia of the lamina muscularis mucosae and a fibromuscular obliteration of the lamina propria mucosae.
These clinical, endoscopical and histological findings are characteristic for the solitary rectal ulcer syndrome.
Only 26 paediatric cases (age at diagnosis 6-9 years) have been published so far.
The interval from first symptoms to final diagnosis (mean: 3,7 years, range: 1 week to 9 years) is remarkably long in childhood cases.
Pathogenetically an internal rectal prolapse with secondary ischemic lesions is assumed.
There is no evidence of an association to inflammatory bowel disease.
The ulcers ars often resistant to different medical and surgical options.
Discussion: Pediatricians should be aware of the solitary rectal ulcer syndrome in order to make an earlier diagnosis and to prevent unnecessary diagnostic procedures and concerns of patients and their parents about more severe illnesses.
A typology of chronic illness in childhood and adolescence is developed.
In a comparative analysis of 29 studies, maximal androgen deprivation (MAD) was not found to be superior to partial androgen deprivation.
Thus, MAD cannot be regarded as the new gold standard.
Most trials focus on quality of life which - given the palliative aim of the treatment - deserves special attention.
This aspect has not yet been evaluated, however, in the largest multicenter study, Intergroup study 0105.
In patients with advanced bone metastasis or severe pain, MAD treatment should be begun because of the flare phenomenon.
The synergistic effects of LHRH agonists on the prostate are currently being investigated.
Since no clear prognostic factors exist and reduction of serum-PSA levels under MAD does not delay progression, the patient must help to make the decision of whether or not MAD should be begun.
A case of generalized maculopapular rash and local indurated plaques following s.c. injections of either low-molecular-weight heparin or conventional (high-molecular-weight) heparin to a 75-year-old woman is reported.
This rare reaction is described and the literature to date is reviewed.
Perioperative morbidity and mortality in noncardiac surgery are mainly due to cardiovascular complications.
Therefore, perioperative risk assessment is crucial to avoid these adverse events.
In patients above the age of 40 years, the ECG is a basic investigation, often providing hints for cardiovascular diseases.
Stress testing and, in special cases, stress echocardiography or scintigraphy (the latter only in those patients, in which exercise is impossible) can detect significant coronary artery disease.
The vascularization reduced the perioperative risk in particular in those patients with unstable angina or severe coronary artery disease.
However, prophylactic revascularization the stable patient does not improve overall outcome, because the risk of the revascularizing procedure must be added to the risk of noncardiac surgery.
Other diagnostic procedures like echocardiography, chest roentgenogram, routine scintigraphy, halter ECG or halter blood pressure measurement do not add information to the perioperative risk assessment, although these techniques might be very relevant in evaluating other coexisting diseases (heart failure; valve lesions, in particular aortic stenoses etc.)
and can be useful to improve medical treatment preoperatively (e.g.
normalization of blood pressure).
A verrucous carcinoma of the urinary bladder (pT4N0M0, G1) developed in a 66-year-old woman who had been suffering from interstitial cystitis with Hunner's ulcer for 10 years.
Up to now, only 7 cases of verrucous carcinoma of the urinary bladder unassociated with bilharzial cystitis have been reported.
Although the development of a verrucous carcinoma as a complication of interstitial cystitis has not been reported so far, the authors regard the chronic irritation of the bladder to be the most important etiologic factor for the malignant transformation.
After conservative management had failed, a radical cystectomy with supravesical urinary diversion was performed.
The characteristics of interstitial cystitis, verrucous carcinoma and surgical management are discussed.
Introduction: Abdominal actinomycosis is an uncommon disease.
Nevertheless it should be considered in case of unclear tumor-like abdominal masses.
Methods: We report a case of a 49-year-old patient with an intrauterine device.
The patient was submitted with a solid and painful tumor in the upper abdomen.
After sonography, computerized tomography, gastroduodenoscopy and colonoscopy the preoperative presumptive diagnosis was a carcinoma of the transvers colon invading the abdominal wall.
Pathological examination after a right hemicolectomy surprisingly revealed an actinomycosis.
Results: Based on this case diagnostic tools and therapeutic options of actinomycosis of the colon are discussed.
Conclusions: This case illustrates the importance to consider the possibility of actinomycosis when finding an unclear abdominal mass.
After a surgical excision an abdominal actinomycosis requires antibiotic therapy.
Long-term treatment of patients with chronic schizophrenias requires integration of many therapeutic approaches, co-operation of several professions, and regard for the views of patients and relatives.
This review deals with practical aspects of pharmacotherapy, psychotherapy, cognitive resp.
psychological treatments, social resp.
milieu therapy, rehabilitation, interventions based on the concept of Expressed Emotions (EE), psychoeducation and work with relatives.
Continuous neuroleptic treatment is indispensable in most cases to achieve social integration.
Indications for adding on antidepressants, lithium, carbamazepine, benzodiazepines and other drugs are discussed, as well as treatment of negative symptoms, depression and management of treatment-resistant symptoms.
Psychotherapy needs to regard the possibilities of the patient.
In the context of a stable long-term relationship, the patient is supported in experiencing himself as a subject capable of action.
Effectiveness of cognitive treatments to date is limited.
The best results are achieved by social skills training.
Social therapy, which aims at the improvement of functional aspects of the patient, is of paramount importance.
Improved possibilities for work rehabilitation are contrasted by difficulties in financing long-term social rehabilitation.
Interventions based on the EE concept are highly effective, but are rarely used.
Programs that merely convey information without targeting behaviour modification are ineffective.
The functions of facilities of treatment in the community are explained, the integrative role of case-management is stressed.
The effect of a locally applied peppermint oil preparation on tension-type headache was examined in the design of a randomized, placebo-controlled double-blind crossover study for the first time.
The preparation was tested against both the reference substance acetaminophen and to the corresponding placebo.
The liquid test preparation contained 10 g of peppermint oil and ethanol (90 %) ad 100 (test preparation LI 170, Lichtwer Pharma, Berlin); the placebo was a 90 % ethanol solution to which traces of peppermint oil were added for blinding purposes.
The reference preparation contained 500 mg acetaminophen; the placebo tablet was identical to the verum in size and appearance.
The study included the analysis of 164 headache attacks of 41 patients of both sexes ranging between 18 and 65 years of age, suffering from tension-type headache in accordance with the IHS classification.
Four headache episodes per patient were treated in a double-blind, randomized crossover design.
Each headache attack was treated by the application of 2 capsules of the oral medication (1000 mg of acetaminophen or placebo) and the cutaneous application of the oil preparation (peppermint oil or placebo solution).
The oil was spread largely across forehead and temples which was repeated after 15 and 30 minutes.
Using a headache diary, the headache parameters were assessed after 15, 30, 45 and 60 minutes.
Compared to the application of placebo, a 10 % peppermint oil in ethanol solution significantly reduced the clinical headache intensity already after 15 minutes (p < 0.01).
This significant clinical reduction of the pain intensity continued over the one hour observation period.
Acetaminophen, too, proved to be efficient compared to placebo (p < 0.01).
There was no significant difference between the efficacy of 1000 mg of acetaminophen and 10 % peppermint oil in ethanol solution.
Simultaneous application of 1000 mg of acetaminophen and 10 % peppermint oil in ethanol solution leads to an additive effect which remains below the significance threshold, however.
The patients reported no adverse events.
This controlled study showed for the first time that a 10 % peppermint oil in ethanol solution efficiently alleviates tension-type headache.
Peppermint oil thus proves to be a well-tolerated and cost-effective alternative to usual therapies.
The positive results of several multi-center studies significantly improved the immunomodulatory treatment of multiple sclerosis over the last few years.
It was demonstrated that different compounds are capable to reduce the number of relapses and to modulate the progression of disease.
To improve the transition of results obtained in these studies into daily clinical practice, a consensus group started to prepare a report on the current treatment options for the German-speaking European countries.
The aim of this paper is to summarize the current knowledge, compare the results of recent clinical trials with the experience from other  therapeutic options and assess their clinical evidence.
Dislocated metacarpal V fractures, fixed by percutaneous Kirschner wires or other implants near the metacarpophalangeal joint, often show impaired movement despite excellent radiologic findings.
We therefore chose an alternative method using intramedullary Kirschner wire osteosynthesis according to Foucher.
Twenty-five patients were operated on in a 3-year period and movement of the fingers and complications were examined.
Six weeks after operation all fractures were consolidated in anatomical reduction.
One patient suffering from an early stage of Sudeck's dystrophy was healed, and no other complications appeared.
Three months after treatment all patients achieved free movement of the fingers with anatomical alignment.
We therefore recommend intramedullary Kirschner wire osteosynthesis in distal metacarpal V fractures.
Aspiration of toxic substances, foreign material, bacterially contaminated secretions, or water (near-drowning) either immediately leads to cessation of respiration or to impaired ventilation due to airway obstruction, it causes hypoxia due to surfactant dysfunction, and pulmonary infection might develop.
Respiratory insufficiency is the resulting consequence which needs immediate and appropriate therapy and intervention.
The knowledge of risk factors that promote aspiration injury is important for its prevention and limitation.
Mortality varies between 3 and 70% depending on patients studied, and on the nature and amount of aspirated material.
The major cause of death is acute respiratory failure.
The onset of injury to the lung after aspiration is very rapid.
Therefore, therapeutic interventions like bronchoscopy are often too late.
More importantly, oxygenation should be monitored continuously for timely institution of mechanical ventilation.
Antibiotics should not be given routinely but a calculated regime is neccessary when signs of infection develop.
Prognosis in near-drowning considerably depends on early rescue and successful resuscitation.
A rapid onset of cerebral hypothermia during the accident can help to increase the ischemic tolerance of the brain and makes it neccessary to continue advanced life support until rewarming of the near-drowning victim.
Anticipation of individual outcome in unconscious patients is difficult.
One third of them survive with a moderate to severe neurologic damage.
The overall mortality of near-drowning is about 11%.
Pathophysiological aspects, diagnostic procedures, pratical management and possible prophylaxis of aspiration injuries will be discussed.
Background: Semiquantitative classification of corneal topography after penetrating keratoplasty has the potential for focusing information about the areal dioptric power of the cornea.
The purpose of this study was to objectify the procedure of manual semiquantitative classification using a Fourier transform of corneal topography power data and to correlate both methods.
Recently, professional anaesthesiologists organizations, have set up recommendations for intraoperative monitoring.
These recommendations are based upon the assumption that anaesthesia-related deaths are largely preventable and that extensive monitoring will reduce mortality.
Hypoxaemia appears to be an important pathophysiological mechanism, and this is why oxygen monitoring is given a high priority in safety standards in anaesthesia.
However, no reduction in mortality has been definitively shown to follow the use of any monitoring device in randomized, controlled trials.
Four techniques of oxygen monitoring are discussed and evaluated.
Oxygen monitoring during inspiration can be recommended, although its implementation will probably prevent only a few anaesthesia-related deaths.
Pulse oximetry is certainly highly recommended, but also has some deficiencies which are not sufficiently well known considering the popularity of this technique.
Transcutaneous PO2 is considered mainly for historical reasons.
Near infrared spectrometry is a new technique offering noninvasive and continuous monitoring of intracerebral oxygenation.
The increasing frequency of stent implantation into coronary arteries is based mainly on assumptions.
One of these assumptions is that stents may prevent restenosis.
Stents can prevent restenosis as has been shown in two randomized studies (Stress I and Benestent I), but only in large (> 3.0mm) vessels with short denovo lesions.
Despite the very tight selection of patients suitable for stent implantation in these two studies, the advantage for stents remained small (about 10% less restenosis) and appeared to decrease with time following intervention.
There is increasing concern about the extension of stenting in an "unrestricted strategy".
This concern was expressed in the ACC Expert Consensus Document which was published recently (JACC 28, No 3, September 1996: 782-794.
Based on the lack of data for most of the presently used stent indications the expert group recommended a more selective strategy for the implantation of stents into coronary arteries.
Removal of the arterial sheath immediately after PTCA is desirable for patients, reduces the medical staff's workload, and may decrease hospital costs due to a shortened length of stay.
Although the safety and efficacy of the hemostatic systems used especially for the above purpose have been sufficiently documented, inadvertent intraluminal vascular occlusion is theoretically possible.
While partial or complete arterial occlusion in conjunction with the VasoSeal collagen prototype device has been previously reported, similar complications occurring with the Angio-SealTM device were not published.
In this report, we describe a 54-year old female patient (height: 150 cm, weight: 42.5 kg) who was transferred for PTCA following an acute anterior wall myocardial infarction.
Immediately after PTCA, the Angio-SealTM device was deployed utilizing standard technique.
No difficulties were encountered during device deployment, however, immediately following device placement active arterial bleeding occurred.
Due to the inadequacy of hemostasis, heparin was reversed with protamine to avoid further hemorrhagic complications.
Following this, the desired hemostasis quickly occurred, but the patient soon complained about symptoms suggestive of an acute occlusion of the right femoral artery.
Unsatisfactory attempts as lysis resulted in the patient being transferred to vascular surgery.
The complete Angio-SealTM system (anchor including collagen) was located intravasculary, and removed during surgery.
Deviations in the axes can be physiological or pathological.
During growth, the axes of the lower extremities undergo significant changes.
The femoral neck-shaft-angle decreases from 150 ° on average at birth to 120 ° on average at the end of growth.
The lower leg is bowed in a varus direction at birth.
On the basis of an extensive literature search (DIMDI, MEDLINE - status at June 1992), the causes of contact urticaria so far known are displayed in tables.
The contact urticariogens can be divided into (1) chemically defined substances and (2) chemically undefined biological materials.
The causes most frequently encountered in 16 professions are given.
Numerous agents are known for medical professions (physicians, nurses, dentists and dental technicians, veterinary surgeons).
Today, the most frequent single cause of contact urticaria is probably the presence of latex proteins in rubber (gloves, condoms, tubes, balloons, etc.).
When testing is performed a stepwise approach is recommended for safety reasons (rub test, prick test, scratch chamber test).
For some contact urticariogens a commercial radioallergosorbent test (RAST) is available.
In the cases reported in the literature it is not always possible to decide definitely whether the pathogenetic mechanism was immunologic (IgE mediated) or non-immunologic (toxic or pseudoallergic).
When there is a high degree of sensitization (e.g.
to latex) professional activities must be severely restricted, or even completely discontinued in rare cases.
Purpose: To find and describe potential MRI criteria of nutrient vessel canals of carpal bones.
2-Agonists are being used increasingly in anaesthesia and intensive care medicine because of their antihypertensive, analgesic and sedative properties.
Platelets bear 2-receptors on the cell surface.
Stimulation of these receptors by agonists induces platelet aggregation.
The present study examined whether in vitro incubation of blood with the 2-agonists clonidine and dexmedetomidine decreases 2-receptor density and hereby influences platelet aggregation.
Prehospital diagnosis and first line therapy of acute chest pain are among the most frequently encountered challenges for general practitioners and emergency physicians.
Acute myocardial infarction or acute coronary syndromes in general are present in about a third of patients complaining of acute chest pain.
The basis of first line therapy is the understanding of the pathophysiology of myocardial ischemia, the clinical symptoms, the diagnostic tools and the preclinically available therapeutic options.
Time is the most critical factor in myocardial ischemia and subsequent infarction with irreversible injury of subendocardial cells starting within 30-60 minutes of total myocardial ischemia and with transmural infarction becoming complete in 3 to 6 hours.
With 30% of patients dying within the first hour of ischemia mostly due to ventricular arrhyhtmias every effort needs to be made to shorten the delay between symptom onset and start of reperfusion therapy.
The present overview concentrates on the armamentarium of preclincial diagnosis and the options of first line therapy of myocardial infarction with the aim of a short transport time to the hospital and therefore a short delay to more specific therapies like thrombolysis or PTCA.
The aim of surgical intervention in the treatment of primary hyperparathyroidism (pHPT) is the achievement of normocalcemia and euparathyreosis.
Despite improved diagnostic procedures containing comparatively modified pre- and intraoperative methods to determine the position of the parathyroid glands and the most efficient operative technique including minimal-invasive surgery thereof, success cannot be guaranteed.
Therefore, we should strive to avoid reintervention by ensuring a hemorrhage-free, atraumatic, anatomical-orientated operation and providing positive preconditions for reoperation.
Success is based on the four pillars of the HPT surgery: history, embryology with anatomy, neck surgery and experience.
By means of this principle and the results of surgical treatment in 1634 patients with pHPT from 1982 until 1998, we demonstrate a standardized operative technique of pHPT.
A 67-year-old male patient presented with a nephrotic syndrome.
Biopsy of the kidney revealed the characteristic of fibrillary glo-merulopathy on light and electron micros-copy.
Other non-nephritic causes of a nephrotic syndrome (e.g.
amyloidosis, immunotactoid glomerulopathy, light-chain glomerulopathy, cryoglobulinaemia, collagen-III glomerulopathy, fibronectin glomerulopathy) could be excluded.
Besides the case report, differential diagnosis of fibrillary glomerulopathies is presented.
Two patients were infected with sporotrichosis; one had the fixed cutaneous form, the other the lymphocutaneous form.
Sporotrichosis schenckii was identified in both with a culture from a tissue biopsy.
Both patients were successfully treated with itraconazole, one received 100 mg and the other 200 mg itraconazole daily over a 3 months period.
Abstract   Mitoxantrone is an anthracenedione antineoplastic agent that has recently been shown to be effective in ameliorating disease activity in multiple sclerosis (MS) as indicated by clinical and MRI data.
However, the role of mitoxantrone in escalating treatment of patients with frequent and severe relapses and with rapid progression of disability is less clear.
In this retrospective analysis we report on 15 patients with severe relapsing-remitting (9 patients) and secondary progressive MS with superimposed exacerbations (6 patients) treated openlabeled with mitoxantrone in our Clinical Research Group from July 1994 to October 1998.
Eleven of these patients (73%) were treated with azathioprine, interferon-beta-1b or cyclophosphamide before.
The patients received mitoxantrone over a period of at least 12 months (19 +/- 6 months) with a single dose of 10 mg/m2 monthly for the first three months.
Thereafter, infusions were repeated every 3 months (total dose 141 mg +/- 45 mg).
The annual relapse rate could be significantly reduced from 3,0 +/- 1,5 in the year before therapy to 0,5 +/- 0,5 during therapy.
Nine patients (60%) were stabilised, while four patients (27%) showed an improvement of disability.
The treatment was well tolerated with only minor side effects.
These results although retrospectively obtained confirm previous trials showing that mitoxantrone may be useful in MS patients with frequent and severe exacerbations and/or a rapidly progressive course of the disease who have had other immunomodulatory medication.
Interstitial cystitis (IC) represents a rare and complex inflammatory bladder condition in which diagnostics can be challenging.
Strict NIH criteria for its diagnosis were designed for research purposes.
Their routine application would miss large proportions of IC patients.
When IC is suspected, history and physical exam are followed by an evaluation of long-term voiding diaries.
Large voided volumes (functional capacity >250 cc) or longer micturition intervals (>2 h.), absence of nocturia or symptom-free periods reduce the likelihood of IC.
Further exclusion diagnostics include urine tests (infection), cytology (in-situ carcinoma), ultrasound (calculi, bulks, anomalies) and urodynamics in selected cases.
Bladder capacity measurements under sedoanalgesia are of limited value, since functional low-volume bladders can be mechanically extendable.
Cystoscopy under general anesthesia represents the diagnostic standard procedure for IC during which 90% of IC-patients present with characteristic mucosal glomerulations after bladder distension.
Biopsies are recommended for exclusion of malignancy.
Potassium-leak testing plays no relevant role in routine diagnostics due to its poor sensitivity.
Similarly, complex determinations of novel IC markers (histamine, tryptase, cytokines, growth factors, substance P, nitric oxide) are of no relevance in clinical settings and should be restricted to research projects.
According to semiotics, which may be defined as the doctrine of the essential nature and fundamental varieties of signs, objects, and interpretants, pain is considered to be a sign (significant) with very different meanings (significance) either as a naturalistic symptom (of disease) or as a symbol used in a metaphorical context.
When following this methodological perspective it is possible to interpret medical as well as poetic writings on equal terms.
In Graeco-Roman medical texts pain was mostly understood as a result and an indicator of disease, but nonetheless as a symptom which seemed to be actively produced by the affected body.
Especially in the Corpus Hippocraticum dating from the 5th and 4th century B. C. this materialistic and at the same time psychosomatic attitude can be noticed.
Aristotle (4th century B. C.), Celsus (1st century A. D.), and the famous experimental physiologist Galen (2nd century A. D.) agreed that pain was a sign of evil which should be fought without exception.
It was Galen who added the disturbance of function (functio laesa) as the fifth cardinal sign of inflammation to the four well-known cardinal signs of Celsus (rubor, calor, tumor, dolor).
He also coined the term µK to characterize an attack of migraine.
In algotherapy, Galen used a complex pharmacological system which was based upon the four cardinal qualities of humoral pathology.
On the other hand, pain was designed as a multi-dimensional symbol by the famous Graeco-Roman epic poets.
In Homer's Odyssey (8th century B. C.), pain appears transformed into the shape of a scar which is visible and palpable on the hero's leg like an identification tag, whereas in Virgil's Aeneids (1st century B. C.) pain symbolizes weakness and defencelessness which can only be alleviated by the goddess Venus.
In this article current indications and limitations of neuromuscular monitoring are reviewed.
Attention is mainly focused on detection of residual curarisation.
New insights in the pathophysiological consequences of residual neuromuscular blockade and the actual criteria of complete recovery are discussed.
Surprisingly in this context, despite the benefit of neuromuscular monitoring, its utilisation in clinical practice is rather an exception than the routine.
A lack of standardisation of neuromuscular monitoring is probably the major problem on the way to a widespread utilisation of the monitoring.
Three patients presented with an acquired green discoloration of their scalp hair.
History revealed that all of them swam regularly in private swimming pools.
Examination of the hair by atomic emission spectroscopy showed that the green discoloration was caused by an excessively high copper content of the hair.
This exogeneous discoloration is characteristically related to the uptake of copper from private swimming pools.
A 62-year-old female patient presented with bullous, intensely itching cutaneous lesions, which clinically and histopathologically resembled dermatitis herpetiformis (Duhring's disease).
Therapy with DADPS was unsuccessful.
Because of associated cervical lymph node enlargement and splenomegaly, a lymph node biopsy was taken.
Histopathology of a lymph node and of the bone marrow confirmed the diagnosis: angioimmunoblastic lymphadenopathy (AILD)-type T-cell lymphoma.
Intensely pruritic associated skin eruptions are typical for this peculiar kind of lymphoma.
These skin lesions are due to inflammatory cells and not to neoplastic infiltrations.
This case report is the first report of AILD with bullous skin lesions to appear in the literature.
Background: The procedures for prophylaxis and treatment of keratopathy following facial palsy with lagophthalmos are unsatisfying from the functional point of view.
The purpose of our study was to compare the diagnostic performance of a 0.2-T MRI unit and a 1.0-T MRI unit in the evaluation of the anterior cruciate ligament in patients with clinically suspected lesions of this ligament.
Twenty four patients with clinically suspected lesions of the anterior cruciate ligament underwent MRI of the knee on both 0.2-T and 1.0-T MRI units.
Three independent observers evaluated the examinations for primary and secondary signs of a tear of the anterior cruciate ligament.
Frequency of these signs was determined for both modalities, and observer agreement was assessed using the kappa statistic.
Sixteen of 24 patients had signs of tears of the anterior cruciate ligament on the 1.0-T unit; the 0.2-T unit detected primary signs in 15/16 (93 %) patients and secondary signs in 7/12 (43 %) patients.
In 8 patients the 1.0 T unit showed neither primary nor secondary signs for tears of the anterior cruciate ligament; in these patients the 0.2-T unit detected primary signs in 1/8 cases (12 %), and secondary signs in 3/8 cases (37 %).
Observer agreement was very good for the 1.0-T unit and fair for the 0.2-T unit.
There is no substantial difference between 1.0-T units and 0.2-T MRI units in the visualisation of primary signs of tears of the anterior cruciate ligament.
In the visualisation of secondary signs, 1.0-T units are superior to 0.2-T units, and there is a surprisingly high rate of false-positive results with the 0.2-T unit.
As to the reproducibility of the results, the 1.0-T unit is far superior to the 0.2-T unit.
Purpose of our study was to develop a reliable model to define clinical stage I nonseminomatous germ cell tumors (NSGCT) being at low risk and at high risk for occult retroperitoneal metastases based on pathohistological and immunohistochemical parameters in order to stratify the therapeutic approach.
3-5 paraffin-embedded formalin fixed tissue blocks of 149 clinical stage I NSGCT were available from all patients and were analyzed for histopathological features associated with pathological stage: presence/absence of vascular invasion, presence/absence of tunical invasion, percentage of each histological cell type present in the primary tumor.
Immunohistochemical expression of MIB-1, p53, bcl-2, cathepsin D and e-cadherin was evaluated using a semiquantitative scoring ystem.
Statistical analysis was performed by univariate and multivariate logistic regression models.
Percentage of embryonal carcinoma [%EC (p < 0.001)] and presence of vascular invasion [VI (p < 0.0001)] were the most significant independent risk factors associated with pathological stage II disease.
Combination of %EC and VI allowed correct prediction of final pathological stage in 88 % of patients.
Cut-off values including both variables identified correct pathological stage in 131/149 patients (88 %).
Less than 45 % EC and absence of VI correctly identified pathological stage I disease in 91.5 %; more than 80 % EC and presence of VI correctly predicted pathological stage II in 88 % of the patients.
%EC and presence/absence of VI appear to be reliable prognosticators to identify both patients at high risk and at low risk for occult retroperitoneal disease.
P53, bcl-2, MIB-1, cathepsin D and e-cadherin did not appear to be of prognostic value in clinical stage I NSGCT.
In the framework of rheumatic illnesses, the lungs and pleura are often observed to be involved.
Dependent on the basic illness in question, conditions of the bronchoalveolar system, vessels, lymphatic system, and pleura that have developed differently inter- and intraindividually can be diagnosed in toporegionally variable forms and combinations.
In the causal pathogenesis, the initial (auto-)immunological alteration of the alveolar septa plays a role.
When the monocytes, macrophages, and fibroblasts are activated, as a result of a chronic inflammatory process there is increasing reparative proliferation, which finally leads to the nonspecific end stage of irreversible interstitial fibrosis.
The incidence and manifestation forms of lung changes show certain differences dependent on the underyling illness (e.g., rheumatoid arthritis, systemic lupus erythematosus, progressive systemic scleroderma, dermatomyositis and polymyositis, Sjögren syndrome, and mixed connective tissue disease).
In addition to vasculitis and granulomatosis of the lung, therapy-induced lung changes must also be considered in the differential diagnosis since almost all basic therapeutic agents can cause this type of lung condition.
Good knowledge of the parameters from the viewpoint of possible therapeutic measures is indispensable, as is close cooperation between the treating physician and the pathologist.
Scintigraphic imaging identifies pathophysiological processes; in other words it assesses regional perfusion, permeability, leukocytic accumulation and bone turnover.
These processes precede morphological changes and this accounts for the high sensitivity of nuclear medicine procedures as well as the low specificity for the differential diagnosis of different diseases with similar pathophysiological characteristics.
This review (1) describes and evaluates the currently used scintigraphic procedures, (2) suggests their differential use in certain clinical settings in comparison with alternative radiological methods and (3) addresses new developments in diagnosis using nuclear medicine procedures.
In summary, we advise dynamic bone scanning as a primary scintigraphic investigation.
A negative scan excludes osteomyelitis in most cases.
The comparison is made with conventional radiology and clinical history.
In cases with short clinical histories ( = granulocytic inflammation), leukocyte scintigraphy should be the next diagnostic step; in chronic processes (lymphomonocytic inflammation), gallium scintigraphy is advisable.
Other scintigraphic methods might be of additional use in experienced hands.
SPECT is useful for clarifying inconclusive planar scans of the head, spine and large joints.
To assess the clinical effectiveness of glaucoma therapy with diode laser cyclophotocoagulation, 106 eyes (51 eyes with primary open-angle glaucoma, 22 eyes with secondary glaucoma, 10 eyes with narrow-angle glaucoma, 23 eyes with other glaucomas) of 87 patients were treated.
Using a diode laser coupled with a fiberoptic probe, ending in a focusing tip, all eyes were treated with 24-30 spots over 360  ° and 2.8-3.6 J of energy, 1.5 mm posterior to the limbus.
The intraocular pressure was obtained over a period of time until 8-24 months after operation.
Additionally, morphological changes of the ciliary body were observed in 25 eyes by means of ultrasound biomicroscopy.
Our objective was to determine the efficacy of ESWL treatment in children and the extent of auxiliary measures.
In a retrospective analysis we investigated number of auxiliary measures and the stone-free rate in children after ESWL treatment.
We report a 44-year-old female patient who underwent surgery because of a suspected primary tumor of the renal pelvis in imaging procedures.
Histology revealed the diagnosis of mesoblastic nephroma.
This tumor represents a special entity of nephroblastoma that rarely occurs in adults.
There is no unanimous opinion on the biological behavior of mesoblastic nephroma because the tumor behaves differently.
The question of whether nephrectomy is indicated if there are no malignant features is also open.
The decision depends on the given case.
Nephrectomy can only be avoided if the intraoperative situation allows the tumor to be removed with an adequate distance from healthy tissue.
The safety margin is necessary because mesoblastic nephroma shows fingerlike spread into the surrounding tissue.
Cardiopulmonary exercise testing (CPX) is a non-invasive method of recording quantitative data from gas exchange and ventilation for the evaluation of oxidative metabolism at rest and during exercise.
Determination of oxygen uptake (VO2) and carbon dioxide output (VCO2) describes the activity of anaerobic vs aerobic metabolism.
An incremental exercise test measuring gas exchange, ventilation and lactate release was performed in healthy volunteers and in patients suffering from mitochondrial disorders.
At rest as well as during exercise patients with mitochondrial disorders differ from healthy subjects with regard to gas exchange and ventilation parameters.
During exercise, the decreased oxygen utilization of skeletal muscle and early activation of anaerobic metabolism in these patients are mirrored by a reduced anaerobic threshold, reduced maximal oxygen uptake and reduced oxygen pulse.
Our study shows that CPX is a sensitive and practical clinical screening method of investigating mitochondrial disorders.
Monitoring of pH of the esophagus is a routine diagnostic procedure, whereas until now pH-monitoring of the hypopharynx has been used only for scientific research.
In the present study a critical evaluation scale was used to record the results of 112 patients who underwent pH monitoring to determine possible reflux.
Since high refluxes often remain unnoticed clinically, further study is required in certain cases.
The extent of reflux in the esophagus may not represent pathological changes in the hypopharynx.
In such cases 24-h pH monitoring of the hypopharynx can be a useful diagnostic procedure and may also help detect the pathogenesis of "gastric laryngitis".
The occurrence of plasmodial giant cells in the liver is probably a morphological reaction pattern with the most diverse causes.
In babies and infants, these changes occur in particular in neonatal hepatitis and intrahepatic and extrahepatic bile duct atresia.
Viral infections and/or autoimmune reactions are discussed etiologically in giant cell hepatitis in adults (adult giant cell hepatitis, AGCH), which is much rarer.
In some of the cases, there were conspicuously high titers against paramyxoviruses.
Giant cell hepatitis can occur in the course of HIV infection.
These both indicate an infectious cause.
However, the disease cannot be transmitted to chimpanzees.
Apart from our case, only one further case is described in the literature in which a completed hepatitis A infection could be demonstrated serologically.
In addition, the titer of antinuclear antibodies was raised in our patient.
This autoimmune phenomenon is probably of crucial pathogenetic significance in our patient, especially since a hepatitis A infection on its own does not afford an adequate etiological explanation for the form of chronic and active hepatitis with consecutive cirrhotic transformation observed here.
In patients with a significant elongation of the ACL we propose a new therapeutic regimen.
After mobilisation of the tibial insertion of the ACL we pull the bone block with the attached ACL distally.
Thus the ACL is easily tightened.
In accordance with this method, we describe the treatment of a case of a strictly proximal rupture of the ACL: the tibial insertion is mobilised, the bone block with the attached ACL removed from the joint.
Ex vivo sutures are placed into the ACL, the ligament is pulled back into the joint, and the shortening of the ligament caused by the sutures is compensated by slight proximal dislocation of the bone block.
Purpose: One aspect of biocompatibility of IOLs can be tested using specular microscopy of the anterior and posterior surface of the lens in vivo.
Background: The paper focuses on the issues, how couples cope with SIDS and how this can be facilitated by subsequent children, self-help and professional support.
Methods: In a retrospective study, 60 couples, members of a self-help organization, were studied at the average of 5 years (2-215 months) after their loss.
Depression, anxiety, physical complaints and grief were assessed by standardized questionnaires.
A community sample of equal size of men and women of the same age were used as controls.
Results: Average scores of depression and physical complaints were elevated compared to the community sample.
Men and women coped differently with the loss: Bereft mothers were more depressed and ruminated more about cause and preventability of the death than fathers.
They expressed their grief more openly and found it more helpful to speak about their loss.
The presence of subsequent children was of prime importance for coping with the loss; an early subsequent pregnancy was fraught with increased anxiety.
Conclusions: The self-help group serves an important function as a coping resource; the pediatrician plays a key role in the psychosocial care of the afflicted families.
A 63-year-old women developed livedo reticularis during treatment with amantadine.
This reversible side effect of amantadine has been most often seen in women and is frequently associated with persistent ankle edema.
We discuss the signs and symptoms, pathogenesis and treatment of amantadine-induced livedo reticularis.
Despite the diagnostic criteria of the ICD-10 and DSM-IV, the term borderline has been used in a non-specific way for a long time.
For our investigation we constructed a questionnaire, which contained the ICD-10 diagnostic criteria for the borderline personality disorder (BPD), plus the criteria for the other personality disorders and for the schizotype disorder.
The two additional criteria for the BPD used by the DSM-IV were added.
800 psychiatrists and psychologists were asked to mark all criteria, which they thought were typical for the BPD.
By using the operational diagnostic approach for ICD-10 and DSM-IV a disorder was diagnosed from each of the 162 received questionnaires based on the marked criteria.
92,0% of the questionnaires contained marked criteria for the diagnosis of the BPD by ICD-10 and 96,3% by DSM-IV.
In addition each questionnaire contained up to eight other diagnosis.
This is a sign for the difficulty to separate the BPD from other personalitiy disorders or the schizotype  disorder by using operationalised criteria.
Looking at the lack of specifity of the operational diagnostic systems for personality  disorders, e.g.
for the BPD which has been discussed by many authors for years, modification of the diagnostic systems should be considered.
Neurobiological research has implicated the dopamine and serotonin system in the pathogenesis of self-injurious behavior.
The efficacy of antipsychotic drugs has been questioned.
Opened and controlled investigations have shown risperidone is effective for reducing self-injurious behaviour in mentally retardation.
We report about 3 mentally retarded patients which were given open-label riperidone for 12 weeks.They participated in a detailed assessment of behaviour symptoms at baseline and the repititive behaviour was weekly rated with the disability assessment schedule (DAS).
Purpose: To test the capabilities of vacuum core biopsy (VCB) in the diagnosis of mammographically indeterminate lesions.
Materials and Methods: 120 patients (131 lesions) were examined using VCB with 14G or 11G vacuum core.
Radiologic information systems (RIS) and picture archiving and communication systems (PACS) are becoming increasingly widespread.
This leads to new demands on the integration of the individual, formerly independent information systems (RIS, modalities, PACS).
Possible ways of integrating individual systems are introduced.
Besides the detailed description of different realizations of system communication, its role in the PACS at the university hospital in Freiburg is explained.
The integration of different information systems still requires the use of proprietary interfaces.
An appropriate integration generally has been realized in Freiburg.
In the near future DICOM basic worklist management will standardize system integration and render an interdepartmental workflow concept possible.
Even though an available communication standard exists, not all problems in the RIS-modality interface are solved.
Different data models in the various RI systems and modalities demand certain degrees of freedom in the standard.
Thus a satisfactory workflow cannot be guaranteed even when all involved systems conform with the standard.
Background: Denecke developed 1957 a surgical strategy consisting of three or four operative steps for rehabilitation of patients with unilateral paralysis of IXth and Xth cranial nerve.
These four steps are the following: myotomy of the cricopharyngeal muscle, resection of the paralyzed pharyngeal wall, medialization of the paralyzed vocal cord and fixation of the soft palate to the posterior pharyngeal wall which can be facultative.
Reconstruction of the navel after tumour excision with subsequent navel resection is of great aesthetic importance for the patient.
Methods of navel reconstruction are found in the literature but do not provide an elegant solution to the problem.
Our method permits reconstruction of the navel during wound closure, by creation of two opposing trapezoidal skin flaps at the excision margin in the midline of the body; the umbilical fossa is then restored by jointly anchoring these flaps to the linea alba.
Reconstruction has been successfully carried out in this way after melanoma excision in 7 patients.
Mammography is an established diagnostic procedure for breast cancer.
Data concerning screening mammography are available from nine prospectively controlled trials, the largest series being presented from Sweden.
Mammographic screening leads to a significant reduction of breast cancer of 30 % in women ages 50-59 years.
In younger women (40-49 years) the benefit accounts to only 20 % and has not proven to be statistically significant.
Nevertheless, the major advantage of mammographic screening is detection of the non-palpable tumor <= 10 mm in size.
The treatment of these small breast carcinomas leads to long-term survival rates of >= 90 %.
Mammographic screening programs have been introduced in the USA, Canada, Iceland and Sweden for women in their 5th decade of life.
Starting yearly lifelong mammography-screening at the age of 40, the theoretical cancer induction by radiation exposure does not exceed 0.1 %.
Under highly qualified conditions, it should be possible to minimize false-positive and false-negative screening results.
In Germany, screening-mammography is only introduced in patients at high risk for breast cancer.
Based on medical data, mammography must be a part of screening for women with an average risk - starting at the age of 40, although there are still open questions needing further clinical research.
Upper lid closure in facial nerve paresis induced lagophthalmos is often improved by implantation of gold weights.
However, the tolerability of gold implants has not always met expectations.
We therefore investigated whether results could be improved by implantation of well-tolerated platinum implants.
Methods to determine the mechanical properties of surgical wounds and sutures are valuable tools in wound healing research.
So far standardized testing procedures have not been defined in the surgical literature, which reduces the comparability of results from different authors.
Therefore we suggest a modified tensile testing procedure which follows German industrial standards (DIN 53 455).
The experimental set-up includes an universal testing machine and special clamps.
The dumbbell-shaped specimen consist of freshly prepared pig skin and the suture which is to be tested.
Well-known mechanical properties of surgical sutures and wounds were used to approve the precision of the experimental set-up.
Reproducible analysis of all tested sutures and wounds (n = 120) was possible.
We recommend testing procedures adapted to industrial standards to obtain comparable results in determination of mechanical properties of surgical wounds and sutures.
Abstract  An infection with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) leads to a large variety of complications affecting almost every organ system.
With the increasing numbers of HIV infections, some authors have reported an occasional association between an infection with HIV and arterial aneurysm.
However, complications affecting the vascular system demanding surgical intervention are rare.
Partial nasal obstruction in preterm and term infants increases airway resistance.
It may reduce ventilation and cause disturbances of respiratory regulation.
Although this is well established, nasogastric tubes are commonly used, because orogastric tubes are difficult to secure.
A new technique for fixing orogastric tubes was tested in a prospective study in 11 preterm and term infants over a 4 weeks period.
There was no preterm dislocation of an oral tube in 7 patients.
The orogastric tube had to be reinserted once before regular change in 3 patients and only 1 patiend aged 15 weeks presented with multiple dislocations of the tube.
On the basis of a 3 days period for regular change of the orogastric tube the reliability of this new technique was 86,2% for all patients and 92,5% for patients below 8 weeks of age.
Mesenchymal neoplasms of lipogenic differentiation are the most common soft-tissue neoplasms in adults.
In recent years a number of "new" entities and variants have been described.
Their recognition is important to avoid diagnostic pitfalls and inappropriate therapy.
Chondroid lipoma, myolipoma, and purely cutaneous spindle-cell/pleomorphic lipoma are biologically benign neoplasms which may mimic sarcomas morphologically.
Despite high-grade morphology cutaneous liposarcomas carry a favorable clinical prognosis.
Spindle cell liposarcoma is a rare variant of atypical lipomatous tumour (well-differentiated liposarcoma) and must be distinguished from dedifferentiated liposarcoma with metastatic potential and benign spindle cell lipoma.
The advent of cytogenetic and molecular investigations of lipomatous neoplasms has contributed to a better understanding of the biology of these neoplasms and led to a modification of conventional classification schemes.
The intracranial space is divided into two large compartments by the tentorium.
The hydrostatic pressure of spinal fluid is responsible for buoyancy of the brain within these compartments.
In patients with craniectomy this equilibrium is exposed to atmospheric pressure.
We report on four cases of reversible herniation after either bilateral or unilateral decompressive craniectomy performed for increased intracranial pressure (ICP) and failure of conservative ICP treatment.
All four patients had survived a severe neurological disease (encephalitis, subdural haematoma, stroke) which required craniectomy to control raised ICP.
All were successfully weaned from the ventilator and awake and CT scans showed no space-occupying lesion anymore.
The patients showed a typical "sunken pattern" at the trepanation site.
All patients developed clinical signs of transtentorial herniation (i.e.
unilateral dilated pupils, deteriorated alertness, and extensor posturing) shortly after either diagnostic or presumed therapeutic lumbar puncture.
One patient developed herniation a second time while in the typical 30 ° upright position.
After craniectomy, transtentorial herniation is possible even in the absence of increased ICP.
It is related to a negative gradient between atmospheric and intracranial pressure, which is enhanced by changes in the CSF compartment following lumbar puncture.
Lumbar puncture should be avoided if possible and, when necessary, only be performed in the head-down position.
Acute therapy in these cases is quite simple; it requires flat or even head-down positioning and early cranioplasty.
Diseases of the oral cavity, floor of the mouth, and nervous system can be accompanied by disturbances in tongue movement during swallowing.
These disturbances can be diagnosed by videosonography whereby the examiner has to evaluate extensive video documentation of lingual motion.
It was the aim of this study to facilitate this evaluation by the application of a reproducible computer-assisted quantitative analysis procedure.
Video sequences of 56 healthy adults and 19 patients with dysphagias of different etiologies were analysed.
A numerical estimation of swallowing movements was carried out in abstraction from the structures imaged (bolus, air, muscles of the tongue, floor of the mouth, hyoid, etc.).
Intensity changes of the pixels within previously defined radial image sectors were quantified in relationship to time and depicted as sector curves.
The healthy adults demonstrated a characteristic pattern of two motion maxima that appeared within almost all sector curves.
These maxima represented bolus transport movements and the reset movement of the tongue.
Patients with diseases of the tongue or neuromuscular changes caused by disturbances of the central nervous system showed pathological deviations on videosonography.
These appeared as local or general reductions in movement, slow speed motions, repetitive swallowing or unsorted additional movements of the tongue during swallowing.
Clinically-used ketamine is a racemic mixture of two isomers, S-(+)- and R-(-)-ketamine.
Previous investigations showed the anaesthetic potency of S-(+)-ketamine to be three times higher than that of R-(-)-ketamine.
It was the aim of this study to compare the effects of S-(+)-ketamine and racemic ketamine on endocrine and cardiovascular parameters, recovery, and side effects in geriatric patients during total intravenous anaesthesia (TIVA) for orthopaedic surgery.
Forty patients over 60 years of age scheduled for elective hip or knee replacement were investigated in a double-blind, randomised design.
For induction of TIVA, patients received 0.1 mg midazolam, 0.5 mg atropine, 1 mg/kg S(+)-ketamine or 2 mg/kg racemic ketamine, respectively, 2 mg vecuronium, and 1.5 mg/kg suxamethonium.
After intubation and relaxation with a total dose of 0.1 mg/kg vecuronium, a continuous infusion of 2 mg/kg per hour S-(+)- or 4 mg/kg per hour racemic ketamine was administered throughout surgery.
Blood samples were taken through a central venous catheter at seven time-points, before induction as well during and after surgery, until the 1st postoperative morning for analysis of adrenaline, noradrenaline (by high-pressure liquid chromatography with electrochemical detection), anti-diuretic hormone (ADH), adrenocorticotropic hormone (ACTH), cortisol (by radioimmunoassay), glucose, and lactate.
In addition, systolic arterial pressure (SAP), heart rate (HR), and arterial oxygen saturation were measured, and the time intervals between the end of ketamine infusion and the return of consciousness and orientation were protocolled.
The incidence and assessment of dreams and other side effects were reported by the patients.
Biometric data of the groups were comparable, the mean age of both groups being 68 years.
Plasma adrenaline, noradrenaline, ADH, ACTH, cortisol, and glucose as well as SAP and HR increased significantly (P<0.05) during the course of anaesthesia.
The influence on lactate levels was not significant.
There were no differences between S-(+)- and racemic ketamine with respect to these parameters.
Three patients in the ketamine-racemate group showed severe arterial hypertension and were withdrawn from the study.
Recovery clearly improved after administration of S-(+)-ketamine compared to the racemate.
Simple orders were followed after 2.0 +/- 3.4 versus 4.9 +/- 6.8 min (P=0.07), orientation with respect to person returned after 5.7 +/- 4.0 versus 14.6 +/- 10.0 min (P<0.001) and spatial orientation after 8.2 +/- 5.4 versus 17.4 +/- 9.7 min (P<0.001).
After racemic ketamine, 1 patient remembered a negative dream and 1 patient a positive dream.
In the S-(+)-group, 1 positive dream was reported.
No intraoperative awareness was reported, and all patients would accept the same anaesthesia again.
Increases in cardiovascular parameters and insufficient reduction of the stress response with respect to ADH, ACTH, and cortisol seem to require a more potent hypnotic element during TIVA with ketamine.
With regard to endocrine and cardiovascular parameters, the pharmacodynamic effects of racemic and S-(+)-ketamine were comparable.
Because of the significant improvement in recovery and the reduced quantitative drug load, S-(+)-ketamine offers a clinical advantage compared with currently used racemic ketamine.
The closure of large circular defects on the scalp is technically difficult and cosmetically often not satisfying, if a free transplant is necessary.
Following the technique of Tillmann described first in 1908, several flaps shaped like a windmill can be combined.
We report on 14 patients (ages 41-88 years) where large defects resulting from the excision of various tumors (5 melanomas, 5 basal cell carcinomas, 1 keratoacanthoma, 1 trichilemmal cyst, 1 squamous cell carcinoma, 1 skin metastasis) were successfully closed by this method.
The diameter of the defect ranged between 4 and 8 cm (mean 5,7 cm).
Size and number of the rotating flaps (3 or 4) was varied according to the size of the defect and the mobility of the surrounding tissue.
The procedure was performed with local anesthesia in all cases.
Wound healing occurred without complications except in 3 cases.
2 patients (63 years, 70 years) developed small necrotic areas on the tips of the flaps.
In a 74 year old man with a very large defect of 8 cm diameter, one flap of four underwent total necrosis.
The cosmetic result was rated "very good" in 71,4% and "good" in 14,3%.
The preservation of the terminal hair turned out to be of special advantage.
The "windmill procedure" is an important addition to the surgical approaches for closure of large defects on the scalp, particularly in young patients.
Intimal sarcoma of the pulmonary artery is an extremely rare type of malignant tumor of the large vessels.
Despite systematic diagnostics, distinguishing between pulmonary emboli and tumors is difficult.
We report a patient who was referred because of suspected embolic occlusion of the pulmonary artery.
The operation was started with the intention of performing a pulmonary artery thromboendarterectomy; however, intraoperative histology revealed a malignant mesenchymal tumor.
Therefore, the left lung was resected with the use of extracorporeal circulation, and the pulmonary trunk and right pulmonary artery were reconstructed.
A solitary right lung metastasis was resected 3 months later using stapling devices.
Complete surgical resection is the treatment of choice for patients with sarcoma of the pulmonary arteries.
Surgical therapy often includes extensive reconstructive measures.
Since, thromboembolic obstruction cannot be excluded preoperatively, patients with this type of disease should be treated at centers experienced with the broad spectrum of pulmonary artery surgery.
Abstract  A rare cause of painful swelling of the knee cavity can be an aneurysm of the popliteal vein.
Only 28 cases are reported in the literature.
We treated a 20-year-old male patient who underwent three arthroscopies, one operation and one MRI; finally, phlebography detected a popliteal vein aneurysm and a malformation of the deep venous system of the popliteal and proximal calf veins.
To avoid the threat of pulmonary embolism a resection of the aneurysm with interposition of a venous autograft was performed.
Twelve months after the operation the patient is free of symptoms with a patent autograft.
Hearing aids have fundamental disadvantages: (1) stigmatization of the patient; (2) the sound is often found to be unsatisfactory due to the limited frequency range and undesired distortion; (3) in many patients, the ear canal fitting device generally necessary leads to an occlusion effect; (4) acoustic feedback when amplification is high.
Conventional hearing aids transmit sound into the ear canal via a small microphone.
Sound has the disadvantage of requiring high output sound pressure levels for its transmission.
This along with the necessary miniaturization of the loudspeaker as well as the resonances and reflections in the closed ear canal contribute to the disadvantages mentioned.
In contrast, implantable hearing aids do not make sound signals but micromechanical vibrations.
An implantable hearing aid has an electromechanical transducer instead of the loudspeaker of a conventional hearing aid.
The hearing signal does not leave the transducer as sound but as a mechanical vibration which is directly coupled to the auditory system bypassing the air.
This implantable hearing aid is either coupled to the tympanic membrane, the ossicular chain, the perilymph of the inner ear, or the skull.
Corneal cells are known to participate in the regulation of local inflammatory processes by secretion of cytokines.
As the corneal endothelium may be exposed to endotoxin in organ culture and endotoxin is known to trigger inflammatory reactions, we investigated the effect of endotoxin from E. coli on organ cultured donor corneae with respect to autocrine and paracrine functions and the endothelial viability and density.
For the majority of patients with sensorineural hearing loss (SNHL) many available hearing aids often do not achieve satisfactory results.
For these patients partially implantable hearing devices have been developed, allowing distortion-free hearing and speech intelligibility that may be superior to conventional hearing aids.
The external parts of partial implants, however, may result in a patient's stigmatization.
Furthermore, they do not use the acoustic properties of the external auditory canal.
Recently, we published the successful development of the first totally implantable hearing device for the treatment of SNHL (HNO 46 [1998] 853-863).
Here we report the first implantations of this unique, totally implantable electronic hearing system in patients with SNHL: Implex TICA LZ 3001.
The implant microphone is implanted subcutaneously in the outer ear canal near the ear drum.
The signal is processed by a digitally programmable multichannel audioprocessor located subcutaneously on the bony skull behind the ear.
A piezoelectric transducer is coupled to the body of the incus and drives the ossicular chain by vibratory actions.
Energy is provided by an implantable battery.
Implanted patients describe hearing as being distortion-free and transparent.
Speech intelligibility and the hearing of music are improved.
Patients may achieve better speech discrimination, especially in the presence of background noise.
The aid can be used during sports, including swimming.
To our knowledge, this is the first report of the implantation of a totally implantable electronic hearing system in patients.
These results encourage further implantations of the totally implantable hearing system in the course of an ongoing clinical study.
Catheter ablation by means of radiofrequency energy (RF) is an established method in the treatment of various forms of supraventricular and atrioventricular tachycardias.
In patients with ventricular tachycardia (VT), the success of catheter ablation depends on the pathophysiological mechanism of the arrhythmia and on the underlying heart disease.
In the following report we give a definition of the terms nomenclature and classification.
We find out, that the two terms are very similar.
They include the keys for diagnosis and therapy.
We propose a method to construct new coding-systems.
Furthermore we report about the existing coding-systems in Orthopaedics and Traumatology.
We cite a list of national and international coding-systems.
Because of the actuality we finally give a definition of the term "Indikationsspezifische Komplikation", which is of importance since the "5.
Änderungsverordnung" of the "BPFLV-95" within the classification of the "Fallpauschalen".
"Fallpauschalen" are a system like the American DRG's (Diagnosis related groups), but not exacly the same.
Resection of a stenosing colon tumor in an 89-year-old male patient led to the diagnosis, unusual at this age, of an inflammatory pseudotumor (synonym: plasma cell granuloma) of the retroperitoneum and mesentery, which invaded the large bowel and showed infiltration of one regional lymph node.
Histology and immunohistochemistry (demonstrating a myofibroblastic phenotype of the proliferating spindle cells and polyclonality of abundantly present plasma cells) of the specimen resembled previously reported lesions in various locations.
The etiology and exact nosological classification of inflammatory pseudotumors are not yet unequivocally settled.
